1. 

About the job
This role is about owning the silicon journey from floorplan to signoff.

5-8 years in physical design and SoC implementation 
Strong experience in Cadence tools: Innovus, Tempus, Voltus, Quantus 
Hands-on with floorplanning, PnR, STA, and EM/IR closure 
Proven ability to meet aggressive PPA targets 
Experience in clock tree, routing optimization, and extraction 
Strong understanding of ASIC design flow and signoff 
Exposure to automation and flow improvements 
Strong collaboration and execution mindset 

If PPA targets excite you more than scare you, this one's for you.

Requirements

Physical Design Engineer | ASIC Physical Design Engineer (PnR/STA)

----------------

2.
About Eridu

Eridu India Private Limited, a wholly owned subsidiary of Eridu Corporation, Saratoga, California, USA, is looking to hire highly motivated and talented professionals for its R&D center in Bengaluru to join our world-class team.

Eridu is a Silicon Valley-based hardware startup pioneering infrastructure solutions that accelerate AI data centers to deliver Faster AI. Today’s AI performance is frequently limited by communication bottlenecks. Eridu introduces multiple industry-first innovations across silicon, packaging, software, and systems to deliver an order of magnitude improvement in performance and unlock greater GPU utilization to speed training job completion times and tokens-per-second for more profitable inference. We do this while simultaneously reducing capital and power costs and improving reliability.

The company’s solutions and value proposition have been widely validated by leading hyperscalers.

Eridu has raised over $200M to date including its most recent, oversubscribed Series A round. The company is led by a veteran team of Silicon Valley executives who have delivered multiple billion dollar product lines and led multiple companies to billion dollar exits, including serial entrepreneur Drew Perkins, co-founder of Infinera (NASDAQ: INFN), Lightera (acq. by Ciena), Gainspeed (acq. by Nokia) and Mojo Vision (the world’s leading micro-LED company). The company is in execution mode and has a world-class engineering team with decades of experience in state-of-the-art silicon, packaging, optics, software, and systems. Eridu is working with best-in-class supply chain partners including silicon, packaging and systems.

Visit our website eridu.ai to learn more.

Responsibilities

Define the Physical Assembly of SOC. involving all aspects of physical design functions such as P&R, timing, floorplan, clocking, electrical analysis, and power.
Proficiency in Synthesis design constraints (SDC).
Design and Architect Top Level and block Level Floor planning of the entire SoC.
Sound Proficiency in either Innovus or Synopsys Fusion Compiler required. Proficiency in synthesis, Floor planning Power Planning and Timing closure are required.
Prior experience with large skew optimized clock tree designs like H-Tree preferred. Clock Grid exposure is a plus.
Work extensively with Micro-architects to perform feasibility studies and explore performance, power & area (PPA) tradeoffs for design closure.
Develop physical design methodologies and customize recipes across various implementation steps to optimize PPA.
Work with a multi-functional engineering team to implement and validate physical design by running all signoff flows such as Timing, Power, EM/IR, PDV.

-----------

3.

About the job
Job Title: Physical Design Engineer

Job Type: Onsite

Location: Bengaluru

Experience: 4+ Years



Responsibilities:

Handle end-to-end physical design: floor planning, placement, CTS, routing, and signoff
Drive timing closure and optimize PPA (power, performance, area)
Fix setup/hold violations using STA
Ensure DRC/LVS and IR/EM clean design
Work closely with RTL, DFT, and verification teams


Requirements:

4+ years in ASIC/VLSI Physical Design
Hands-on with Cadence Innovus / Synopsys ICC2
Strong in STA using Synopsys PrimeTime
Knowledge of physical verification using Mentor Calibre
Scripting in TCL/Shell/Python


---------------

4.
What You'll Be Doing

 In this position, you will expected to be part of the physical design methodology team. ﻿﻿PD activities includes floor plans, abstract view generation, RC extraction, PNR, STA, EMIR DROP, DRCs & schematic to layout verification.
Work in collaboration with design team for addressing design challenges. ﻿﻿Help team members in debugging tool/design related issues. ﻿﻿Constantly look for improvement in RTL2GDS flow to improve PPA. Troubleshoots a wide variety up to and including difficult design issues and applied proactive intervention.
Write scripts (TCL/Python) to help design teams move forward with their design and chip goals
Build flows based on industry standard EDA tools to implement designs efficiently and improve PPA. Support flows for chip design teams across tapeouts and tech nodes.

What We Need To See

 BE/BTECH/MTECH, or equivalent experience.
 3+ years of experience in Physical Design, preferably with methodology/flow experience.
 Strong understanding in the RTL2GDSII flow or design implementation in leading process technologies. Good understanding of the RTL2GDSIl concepts related to synthesis, place & route, CTS, timing convergence, layout closure.
 Expertise on high frequency design methodologies. Good knowledge and experience in Block-level and Full-chip Floor-planning and Physical verification. Working experience with tools like ICC2/Innovus, Primetime/Tempus/Seahawk etc used in the RTL2GDSIl implementation.
 Strong knowledge and experience in standard place and route flows ICC2/Synopsys and Innovus/Cadence flows preferred. Well versed with timing constraints, STA, IR and ECO timing closure.
Strong algorithmic thinking with good automation skills in PERL, TCL, tool specific scripting on one of the industry leading Place & Route tools. Python will be helpful too.
 Ability to multi-task and flexibility to work in global environment.
 Good communication skills and strong motivation, Strong analytical & Problem Solving skills
Willingness to learn and master new techniques quickly
Innovate and drive changes across teams & workflows


----------------

5.

Must-Have:

Should have in depth experience in Floor-planning, CTS, Power routing, place and route, timing closure, DRC and LVS
Should have worked on the latest technology nodes (14nm or 2nm to 5nm)
Must have experience in Static timing analysis
Must have experience in Physical verification and appropriate fixes
Should have worked on block level and top-level designs
Strong problem-solving skills and communication skills
Ability to mentor and work closely with junior engineers
Tools: Synopsys and Cadence

--------------

6.

Responsibilities:

• Physical Design Implementation: Perform floor planning, partitioning, physical implementation, and timing constraint development for complex IC designs, ensuring robust STA and EM/IR closure.
• Timely, High-Quality Delivery: Own block-level delivery across multiple milestones with a focus on quality, completeness, and schedule adherence.
• Clock & Routing Optimization: Optimize clock tree architectures, guide routing strategies, and drive extraction quality improvements.
• PnR Execution: Manage the entire place-and-route cycle, including macro/IP integration, hierarchical design, and signoff readiness.
• Leadership & Planning: Provide accurate area and effort estimates, contribute to planning, and lead execution to meet project goals and timelines.
• Team Collaboration: Work effectively with cross functional peers and demonstrate strong teamwork and communication skills.
• Automation & Efficiency: Develop automation to improve flow robustness, efficiency, and overall PPA quality.



Requirements:

• Experience: 5–8 years of hands-on physical design implementation, flow development, and Tempus-based STA analysis.
• PPA Expertise: Proven ability to meet aggressive PPA targets for SoC designs, including advanced place-and-route and IP integration.
• Methodology Knowledge: Strong understanding of ASIC physical design flows, best practices, and signoff methodologies.
• Tools & Technologies:

– Cadence PD Flow (Required): Innovus (PnR), Tempus (STA), Quantus (Extraction), Voltus (IR/EM).
– Experience with signoff tools such as Calibre.
• Advanced Nodes: Hands-on experience across multiple advanced technology nodes.
• Digital Fundamentals: Strong grasp of digital electronics and physical design fundamentals.
• Efficiency Focus: Experience improving design flow efficiency and reducing cycle time.


----------------

7.

Requirements : 



Engineer with a good attitude, strong analytical skills, effective communication, and excellent problem-solving abilities.


Key Responsiblities: 



Own critical CPU units and drive to convergence from RTL-to-GDSII - synthesis, floor-planning, place and route, timing closure, and signoff 



Understand the micro-architecture to perform feasibility studies on performance, power, and area (PPA) tradeoffs for design closure. 



Develop and improve physical design methodologies and customize recipes across various implementation steps to optimize PPA. 



Implement floor plan, synthesis, placement, CTS, Timing Closure, Routing, Extraction, Physical Verification (DRC & LVS), EM/IR and signoff.


 Handling different PNR tools - Synopsys fusion compiler, Cadence, PrimeTime, StarRC, Calibre, Apache Redhawk


------------------

8.


About the job
Job Description

The candidate will be responsible for implementing the place and route of design blocks including floorplanning, placement, clock tree building, routing, timing optimizations, DRC, LVS fixing, IR drop analysis, Formal verification, power intent checks etc. The candidate will also be responsible for block-level physical design closure in terms of timing, power, DRC/LVS, etc.

Requirements

 3-8years of experience in ASIC Physical Design
 Have good knowledge of the entire physical design process from floorplan to GDSII generation
 Good Exposure to Physical Verification Process
 Have hands-on experience in the latest sub-micron technologies below 10 nm
 Hands–on experience in leading PnR tools Synopsys ICC/ICC2
 Experience in low power designs and handling congestion or timing critical tiles will be preferred
 Should be a quick learner and have good attention to detail
 Experience in ECO implementation preferred
 Scripting skills in Perl/Tcl/Python etc
 Must have good communication & problem-solving skills.
 Should be able to handle PnR tasks with minimal supervision


--------------

9. 


About the job
L&T Technologies (LTTS) is looking for Physical Design Engineers (PnR)with 4.5+ Years of experience.


Job Location : Bangalore 



Please find the detailed job description below ::


 • IP/Block level PnR activities from Netlist to GDS-II.
 • Good knowledge of all PnR activities like Floor-planning, Placement, CTS, Routing, Timing closure(STA), signoff checks like FEV, VCLP, EMIR and PV.
 • Knowledge of industry stanrd E tools (Synops, Cadence, Mentor)
 • Worked on DSM technologies, tsmc 5nm and below experience preferred.
 • Knowledge of scripting skills.
 • Minimum Experience : 4.5+ Years


------------

10.


About the job
Job Description



Experience in all phases of the IC design process from RTL->GDS2
Physical implementation of SoC/Full-chip-level and/or high-speed CPU/GPU/DSP cores
Experience in high-speed, low-power, mixed-signal SoC’s is a plus
Experience in developing PNR methodology/flow to and supporting a larger PD team
Experience on floor planning, clocking & power network architecture and design
Experience in low-power implementation using UPF/CPF power intent flow
Experience in I/O Ring, RDL routing, bumps and other top-level design considerations
Experience in LVS/DRC/ERC, EMIR (static & dynamic), LEC and Reliability sign-off checks
Experience in STA analysis, timing closure and defining chip sign-off criterion
Thorough understanding of digital design, timing analysis, and DFT
Good understanding of foundation IP components – Standard cells, SRAMs etc.
EDA Tools: Synopsys (DCT, ICC2, PT-SI, Red hawk), Cadence (Genus, Tempus, Innovus, Voltus)



------------------

11.

About the job
Job description

Roles and Responsibilities

Good experience in PD execution of multiple medium to High critical blocks/HMs from Netlist to GDSII
Develop and qualify the methodology and implementation flow in advanced technologies like 14nm and below.
Well versed with FC/Innovus tools and good understanding of place/cts/Route critical settings
Develop expertise in ASIC Synthesis, Floor Planning, STA (Static Timing Analysis), and other relevant technologies.
Good experience in Low power designs
Conduct thorough analysis of designs to identify potential issues and implement solutions.
Perform physical design activities including floor planning, PNR (Physical Netlist) creation, and timing closure using Innovus tools.


-------------

12.


About the job
Minimum qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Electrical Engineering or equivalent practical experience.
5 years of experience with advanced design, including clock/voltage domain crossing, Design for Testing (DFT), and low power designs.
Experience with System on a Chip (SoC) cycles.
Experience in high-performance, high-frequency, and low-power designs.

Preferred qualifications:

Master’s degree in Electrical Engineering.
Experience in coding with System Verilog and scripting with Tool Command Language (TCL).
Experience in VLSI design in SoC or experience with multiple-cycles of SoC in ASIC design.
Experience in coding constraints and scripting with TCL.
Experience with Static Timing Analysis (STA) convergence on blocks/Subsystem (SS)/SoC

About The Job

Be part of a team that pushes boundaries, developing custom silicon solutions that power the future of Google's direct-to-consumer products. You'll contribute to the innovation behind products loved by millions worldwide. Your expertise will shape the next generation of hardware experiences, delivering unparalleled performance, efficiency, and integration.

In this role, you will be part of a team developing SoCs used to accelerate Machine Learning (ML) computation in data centers. You will collaborate with members of architecture, verification, power and performance, physical design etc. to specify and deliver high quality designs for next generation data center accelerators. You will solve technical problems with innovative micro-architecture and practical logic solutions, and evaluate design options with complexity, performance, power and area in mind.

Behind everything our users see online is the architecture built by the Technical Infrastructure team to keep it running. From developing and maintaining our data centers to building the next generation of Google platforms, we make Google's product portfolio possible. We're proud to be our engineers' engineers and love voiding warranties by taking things apart so we can rebuild them. We keep our networks up and running, ensuring our users have the best and fastest experience possible.

Responsibilities

Define and drive the implementation of physical design methodologies.
Take ownership of one or more physical design partitions or top level.
Manage timing and power consumption of the design.
Contribute to design methodology, libraries, and code review. 
Define the physical design related rule sets for the functional design engineers.



--------------

13.

About the job
Job Description

Key Responsibilities

Lead MCU/subsystem/block-level closure efforts, focusing on timing closure, congestion resolution, power integrity, and physical implementation.
Collaborate closely with SoC-level teams to align on clocking and floor planning strategies, leveraging strong understanding of SoC methodologies without direct ownership of SoC-level activities.
Work on the different power domains and implement UPF.
Apply knowledge of clocking methodologies to ensure subsystem clock domain integration aligns with overall SoC clock architecture.
Develop and refine subsystem closure methodologies and automation flows to improve design quality and efficiency.
Mentor and guide physical design engineers within the subsystem teams, promoting best practices and methodology adoption.
Work cross-functionally with RTL designers, STA, power, verification, and backend teams to ensure smooth subsystem integration and closure.
Proactively identify and mitigate physical design risks, coordinating with SoC teams on potential impacts and solutions.


-----------------

14.

About the job
Job Title: Sr. Design Engineer – Façade
Company: Shreeji Façade System Pvt. Ltd.
Location: Mumbai


Job Summary:

We are looking for an experienced Sr. Design Engineer specializing in facade systems to lead design, detailing, and execution support for high-rise and commercial projects. The candidate will be responsible for delivering accurate and efficient design solutions aligned with project specifications and timelines.


Key Responsibilities:

Prepare detailed façade design drawings (shop drawings, GA drawings, fabrication drawings).
Design and develop curtain wall systems, shop drawing, Production drawing, MTOs, BTOs glazing systems, cladding, and aluminum façade structures.
Perform structural calculations and analysis for façade systems.
Coordinate with architects, consultants, and project teams for design approvals.
Ensure compliance with project specifications, safety standards, and quality requirements.
Review and validate BOQs, material specifications, and technical submittals.
Provide technical support to the execution and site teams.
Manage design timelines and ensure timely project delivery.


------------------

15.

About the job
Job Title: Physical Design Engineer
Experience: 4+ Years
Location: Banglaore/Hyderabad
Employment Type: Full-time
Industry: Semiconductors / VLSI / ASIC Design
Job Summary:

We are looking for a skilled and motivated Physical Design Engineer to join our backend implementation team. The engineer will be responsible for RTL-to-GDSII implementation of complex SoC blocks or full-chip designs, targeting performance, power, and area (PPA) optimization and signoff closure.
Key Responsibilities:

Own block-level or full-chip implementation from RTL to GDSII.
Perform:
Floorplanning and placement
Clock tree synthesis (CTS)
Routing and optimization
Run and close timing (STA), IR drop, EM, DRC, LVS, and antenna checks.
Drive physical verification and signoff across various corners and scenarios.
Collaborate with RTL, DFT, STA, and power teams for successful integration.
Implement and debug low-power design techniques (UPF/CPF-based flows).
Apply congestion analysis, ECOs, and timing fixes across critical paths.
Optimize for performance, power, and area using EDA tools and foundry guidelines.
Prepare design reports and support tapeout activities.
Required Skills and Experience:

B.E/B.Tech or M.E/M.Tech in Electronics, Electrical, or VLSI Design.
4+years of experience in ASIC physical design.
Strong hands-on experience with tools like:
Place & Route: Cadence Innovus, Synopsys IC Compiler II (ICC2), Siemens Nitro
STA: Synopsys PrimeTime
Signoff: Calibre (DRC/LVS), RedHawk (IR/EM), Tempus
Good understanding of physical design concepts: floorplan, placement, CTS, routing, ECO, and signoff.
Familiarity with scripting languages: Tcl, Perl, Python for flow automation.
Solid grasp of timing analysis, power grid design, and physical verification flows.

----------

16.
About the job
SoC Physical Design Engineers



We need experienced engineers to work on the Physical Design & Implementation of SoCs in cutting edge technology and with complex functionality.


Skills:

3+ years of relevant experience in Block/SoC level Physical Design.


Experience in Block/SoC Physical Design in the following topics:
PnR tools like ICC2/Innovus with regards to physical/timing convergence
14nm / 10nm / 7nm / 5nm process nodes
Tapeout sign-off experience is a must using industry standard tools.
Cadence Encounter/Synopsys ICC2 tool set
SDC, STA and Equivalence checking
Flow automation exposure will be an added advantage.


Working knowledge of Unix, Linux and SKILL, Shell/Python Script ability.


Quick learner with excellent interpersonal, verbal/written communications, problem solving and decision-making skills


Traits:

Adaptable, Flexible, Global Approach/Synthesis, creative and capable of working independently as well as a team player. Should have a strong sense of urgency.
Solutions orientation; Quality driven; Execution minded

-------------------

17.

About the job
Job Description :



Position  : Senior Physical Design Engineer 

Experience : 4 - 12 Years 

Location  : Hyderabad
Work Mode : Work from office 



Required Skills : 



He/She should be able to do top-level floor planning, PG Planning, partitioning,placement, scan-chain-reordering, clock tree synthesis, timing optimisation, SI aware routing, timing analysis/closure and ECO tasks (timing and functional ECOs), SI closure, design rule checks (DRC), and Logical vs. Schematic (LVS) checks, Antenna checks. He/She should have worked on 65nm or lower node designs with adv low power techniques such as Voltage Islands, Power Gating and substrate-bias.
Provide technical guidance and mentoring to physical design engineers.
Interface with front-end ASIC teams to resolve issues.
Low Power Design - Voltage Islands, Power Gating, Substrate-bias techniques.
Timing closure on DDR2/DDR3/PCIE interfaces.
Excellent communication skills.
Strong background of ASIC Physical Design: Floor planning, P&R, extraction, IR Drop Analysis, Timing and Signal Integrity closure.
Extensive experience and detailed knowledge in Cadence or Synopsys or Magma physical Design Tools.
Expertise in scripting languages such as PERL, TCL.
Strong Physical Verification skill set.
Static Timing Analysis in Primetime or Primetime-SI.
Good written and oral communication skills. Ability to clearly document plans.
Ability to interface with different teams and prioritise work based on project needs.

------------

18.

About the job
Create and develop 3D models, assemblies, and detailed 2D drawings using UG NX.
Interpret technical specifications and convert them into accurate design solutions.
Perform design calculations and ensure compliance with applicable standards.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams such as manufacturing, quality, and project management.
Optimize designs for manufacturability, performance, and cost efficiency.
Participate in design reviews and implement feedback effectively.
Maintain proper documentation, revision control, and data management.
Ensure timely delivery of design outputs with high quality.

------------

19.

About the job
PHYSICAL DESIGN ENGINEER/LEAD - NOIDA/Ahmedabad/Bangalore/Hyderabad/Pune



(NO WORK FROM HOME OR REMOTE WORK)

 

Job description: 4 to 15 Years of Hands on Experience

Block level Physical Design Implementation from RTL to GDSII or Netlist to GDSII,
Block level Physical Signoff,
Block level Timing Signoff and ECO generation.
Block level Power signoff.
Good skill on Automation (Perl/Tcl/Awk/Python)
Able to provide technical guidance to Junior Engineer and lead 4-6 engineers.
Must have led small project team.
Good in communication skill as he/she would be single point of contact for client.


-----------------------------

20.

About the job
Are you an experienced Staff Physical Design Engineer looking for your next challenge?


Aion Silicon is actively building a pipeline of talented engineers for future opportunities, and we’d love to hear from skilled professionals who are passionate about Physical Design.
With design centres across the UK, Spain, Hyderabad, and Morocco, we offer the flexibility to base this role in any of our global locations. If you’re interested in exploring future opportunities with us, please click the link below to apply and register your interest.
Purpose of role 

The Staff Physical Design Engineer is expected to work as part of a Physical implementation design team. Within the team the designer will have responsibility for block development and possibly full chip responsibility from RTL to GDS and will be expected to be diligent their ownership of the responsibilities assigned to them. They will also be able manage a team of 2-3 engineers of lower grade and be responsible for their line management and if appropriate day-to-day tasks. 

 
Responsibilities 

 

The person should contribute to physical design projects with little guidance and can work independently.

Should be capable of solving problems of moderate complexity.

Applies judgment in interpreting results and conducting quantitative analysis.

Will be engaged in maintaining a high quality in their work.

Should be able to take multi-assignments from different customers/Teams.

Should be capable of interacting with the more experienced team members to resolve problems.

Should show ability in many tools or be an expert in one or two. Examples of which are: Synthesis, PnR, Formal verification, Custom layout techniques, Analog simulation, and Chip finishing.

Should be able to contributes to technical white papers. 

May contribute to sales support as part of a team, such as Statement of Work

Should be capable of maintaining accurate time keeping.

Should be self-disciplined in executing design tasks.

Team leader of a team of 2-3 engineers or be able to train the junior engineers 

Qualifications 

A degree/masters or PhD in either a relevant subject
 
Skills & experience 

 
Typically, 5+ years’ experience

Should have good tapeout experience on multiple technologies 3nm, 5nm,7nm,12nm,16nm, 22nm, 28nm

Should have worked on the DRC, LVS, ANTENNA, ERC physical verification checks

Should have good work experience and understanding of Concepts in Synthesis, Floorplaning, Placement, CTS, Routing, STA

Input skill set one or more of the following: PnR using either Synopsys ICC, Cadence EDI, Mentor Olympus, Synthesis using either Synopsys DC or Cadence RC, Experience of Formailty or Formalpro, Experience of Mentor Calibre or Synopsys IC Validator

Serves as an independent individual contributor to technical project

Demonstrates capability as a problem solver with an ability to work individually or as part of a team

Evaluates issues and defines solutions as part of a team 

Broadens cross disciplinary knowledge through new assignments 

Attributes 

 

Self-organisation and ability to respond to changing priorities quickly

Team leader and team player

Ability to work under pressure

Organisation and problem-solving skills

Self-motivated

Excellent attention to detail 

Able to work under own initiative

-------------

21.

About the job
As a Physical Design Engineer at Nsemi, you’ll play a crucial role in transforming RTL designs into efficient, high-performance physical layouts. You’ll work on floorplanning, placement, routing, and timing closure, using industry-leading EDA tools. Your expertise will ensure that our designs meet stringent performance, power, and area goals, contributing to the successful tape-out of complex semiconductor chips. This is an exciting opportunity to work on cutting-edge technology in a collaborative and innovative environment.

Physical Design Engineer

As a Physical Design Engineer at Nsemi, you’ll play a crucial role in transforming RTL designs into efficient, high-performance physical layouts. You’ll work on floorplanning, placement, routing, and timing closure, using industry-leading EDA tools. Your expertise will ensure that our designs meet stringent performance, power, and area goals, contributing to the successful tape-out of complex semiconductor chips. This is an exciting opportunity to work on cutting-edge technology in a collaborative and innovative environment.

Physical Design Engineer

As a Physical Design Engineer at Nsemi, you’ll play a crucial role in transforming RTL designs into efficient, high-performance physical layouts. You’ll work on floorplanning, placement, routing, and timing closure, using industry-leading EDA tools. Your expertise will ensure that our designs meet stringent performance, power, and area goals, contributing to the successful tape-out of complex semiconductor chips. This is an exciting opportunity to work on cutting-edge technology in a collaborative and innovative environment.

Qualification Required

Qualification Required:

Typically requires minimum of 3+ years of experience in Physical Design with mainstream P&R tools
Bachelors OR Master’s Degree Engineering in Electronics or Electrical or Telecom or VLSI Engineering.
Typically requires minimum of 3+ years of experience in Physical Design with mainstream P&R tools
Bachelors OR Master’s Degree Engineering in Electronics or Electrical or Telecom or VLSI Engineering.

Roles And Responsibilities

Roles And Responsibilities:

Working on 10nm/7nm/5nm or lower nodes designs with various customers for deployment.
Expertise in solving customer’s problems for critical designs to achieve desired performance, area, and power targets.
Responsible to develop flow and methodology for doing placement, CTS, and routing.
Provide training and technical support to customers
Working on 10nm/7nm/5nm or lower nodes designs with various customers for deployment.
Expertise in solving customer’s problems for critical designs to achieve desired performance, area, and power targets.
Responsible to develop flow and methodology for doing placement, CTS, and routing.
Provide training and technical support to customers

Required Technical And Professional Expertise

Required Technical And Professional Expertise:

Solid experience in place & route flow (placement guidelines, clock-tree synthesis, routing, timing optimizations). Experience on hierarchical designs and/or Low Power implementation is an advantage.
Experience on Synthesis, interfacing with RTL and implementation designers to achieve better quality of results.
Experience on Floorplan design, including placement of hard macros, padring, power grid and custom analog routes.
Experience on Static Timing Analysis related activities (constraints development, parasitic extractions, sign-off requirements).
Knowledge of Physical Verification (DRC/LVS/DFM, chip finishing).
Hands-on experience with FinFET technologies is an advantage
Solid experience in place & route flow (placement guidelines, clock-tree synthesis, routing, timing optimizations). Experience on hierarchical designs and/or Low Power implementation is an advantage.
Experience on Synthesis, interfacing with RTL and implementation designers to achieve better quality of results.
Experience on Floorplan design, including placement of hard macros, padring, power grid and custom analog routes.
Experience on Static Timing Analysis related activities (constraints development, parasitic extractions, sign-off requirements).
Knowledge of Physical Verification (DRC/LVS/DFM, chip finishing).
Hands-on experience with FinFET technologies is an advantage


-------------


22.


About the job
NVIDIA has continuously reinvented itself. Our invention of the GPU sparked the growth of the PC gaming market, redefined modern computer graphics, and revolutionized parallel computing. Today, research in artificial intelligence is booming worldwide, which calls for highly scalable and massively parallel computation horsepower that NVIDIA GPUs excel NVIDIA is a "learning machine" that constantly evolves by adapting to new opportunities that are hard to solve, that only we can address, and that matter to the world. This is our life's work, to amplify human creativity and intelligence. As an NVIDIAN, you'll be immersed in a diverse, supportive environment where everyone is inspired to do their best work. Come join our diverse team and see how you can make a lasting impact on the world!

NVIDIA is seeking passionate, highly motivated, and creative design engineers to be part of a team working on industry-leading GPUs and SOCs. This position offers the opportunity to have real impact in a dynamic, technology-focused company impacting product lines ranging from consumer graphics to self-driving cars and the growing field of artificial intelligence. We have crafted a team of exceptional people stretching around the globe, whose mission is to push the frontiers of what is possible today and define the platform for the future of computing.

What You'll Be Doing

 In this position, you will expected to be part of the physical design methodology team. ﻿﻿PD activities includes floor plans, abstract view generation, RC extraction, PNR, STA, EMIR DROP, DRCs & schematic to layout verification.
Work in collaboration with design team for addressing design challenges. ﻿﻿Help team members in debugging tool/design related issues. ﻿﻿Constantly look for improvement in RTL2GDS flow to improve PPA. Troubleshoots a wide variety up to and including difficult design issues and applied proactive intervention.
Write scripts (TCL/Python) to help design teams move forward with their design and chip goals
Build flows based on industry standard EDA tools to implement designs efficiently and improve PPA. Support flows for chip design teams across tapeouts and tech nodes.

What We Need To See

 BE/BTECH/MTECH, or equivalent experience.
 3+ years of experience in Physical Design, preferably with methodology/flow experience.
 Strong understanding in the RTL2GDSII flow or design implementation in leading process technologies. Good understanding of the RTL2GDSIl concepts related to synthesis, place & route, CTS, timing convergence, layout closure.
 Expertise on high frequency design methodologies. Good knowledge and experience in Block-level and Full-chip Floor-planning and Physical verification. Working experience with tools like ICC2/Innovus, Primetime/Tempus/Seahawk etc used in the RTL2GDSIl implementation.
 Strong knowledge and experience in standard place and route flows ICC2/Synopsys and Innovus/Cadence flows preferred. Well versed with timing constraints, STA, IR and ECO timing closure.
Strong algorithmic thinking with good automation skills in PERL, TCL, tool specific scripting on one of the industry leading Place & Route tools. Python will be helpful too.
 Ability to multi-task and flexibility to work in global environment.
 Good communication skills and strong motivation, Strong analytical & Problem Solving skills
Willingness to learn and master new techniques quickly
Innovate and drive changes across teams & workflows


-----------------

23.

About the job
Job Details

Job Description:

As a Physical Design Engineer, you will be responsible for planning, designing, and validating power delivery networks (PDN) for System-on-Chip (SoC) and custom IPs. You will leverage Fusion Compiler for PDN implementation and collaborate closely with IP partition owners, IR and reliability owners, and dedicated IR/EM/power integrity engineers to understand power requirements and ensure robust PDN solutions.

Your Responsibilities Will Include But Are Not Limited To

 Planning and designing PDN for SoCs and custom IPs using Fusion Compiler.
 Performing layout verification of the PDN network and clearing all DRCs (Design Rule Checks).
 Collaborating with IP partition owners, IR/reliability owners, and dedicated IR/EM/power integrity engineers to gather power requirements and implement them in PDN design.
 Ensuring PDN meets performance, reliability, and area goals.
 Applying best-known methods to create high-quality PDN layouts efficiently.

The Ideal Candidate Should Exhibit The Following Behavioral Traits

 Strong problem-solving and teamwork skills.
 Effective communication and collaboration across teams.
 Attention to detail and adaptability.
 Ability to work independently and proactively address design challenges.

Qualifications

Minimum qualifications are required to be initially considered for this position. Preferred qualifications are in addition to the minimum requirements and are considered a plus factor in identifying top candidates.

Minimum Qualifications

 BTech in Electrical or Electronics Engineering with 3+ years of relevant experience OR MTech in VLSI or related field with 2+ years of relevant experience.
 Experience with Fusion Compiler.
 Technical skills required for PD engineers.

Preferred Qualifications

 Scripting experience with TCL for automation.
 Relevant expertise in PDN design and implementation.
 Experience in layout design or LV (Layout Verification) cleanup using Synopsys Fusion Compiler (FC) or ICC.

Requirements listed would be obtained through a combination of industry relevant job experience, internship experiences and or schoolwork/classes/research.


-----------------

24.

About the job
Job details 

Are you an experienced Staff Physical Design Engineer looking for your next challenge? 

 
Aion Silicon is actively building a pipeline of talented engineers for future opportunities, and we’d love to hear from skilled professionals who are passionate about Physical Design. 

 
With design centres across the UK, Spain, Hyderabad, and Morocco, we offer the flexibility to base this role in any of our global locations. If you’re interested in exploring future opportunities with us, please click the link below to apply and register your interest. 

 
Purpose of role 

 
The Staff Physical Design Engineer is expected to work as part of a Physical implementation design team. Within the team the designer will have responsibility for block development and possibly full chip responsibility from RTL to GDS and will be expected to be diligent their ownership of the responsibilities assigned to them. They will also be able manage a team of 2-3 engineers of lower grade and be responsible for their line management and if appropriate day-to-day tasks. 

 
Responsibilities 

 
The person should contribute to physical design projects with little guidance and can work independently.

Should be capable of solving problems of moderate complexity.

Applies judgment in interpreting results and conducting quantitative analysis.

Will be engaged in maintaining a high quality in their work.

Should be able to take multi-assignments from different customers/Teams.

Should be capable of interacting with the more experienced team members to resolve problems.

Should show ability in many tools or be an expert in one or two. Examples of which are: Synthesis, PnR, Formal verification, Custom layout techniques, Analog simulation, and Chip finishing.

Should be able to contributes to technical white papers.

May contribute to sales support as part of a team, such as Statement of Work

Should be capable of maintaining accurate time keeping.

Should be self-disciplined in executing design tasks.

Team leader of a team of 2-3 engineers or be able to train the junior engineers 

--------------------------

25. 

About the job
Hyderabad, Guntur

Role And Responsibility

Ability to execute block level P&R and Timing closure activities.
Will be responsible for owning up block level P&R. Perform Netlist2GDS on blocks
Implementation of multimillion gate SoC designs in cutting edge process technologies (28nm,16nm,14nm & below ).
Strong Hands-on expertise on any of the aspects of physical design including Synthesis, Floor Planning, Power Plan, Integrated Package and Floorplan design, Place and Route, Clock Planning and Clock Tree Synthesis, complex analog IP integration, Parasitic Extraction, Timing Closure, Power / IR Drop (Static and Dynamic), Signal Integrity Analysis, Physical Verification (DRC, ERC, LVS), DFM and DFY and Tapeout.
Expertise in analyzing and converging on crosstalk delay, noise glitch, and electrical rules in deepsub micron processes required. Understanding of process variation effects, and experience in variations analysis/modeling techniques and convergence mechanism would be a plus.
Expertise in Synopsys ICC2, PrimeTime physical design tools.
Skill and experience in scripting using Tcl or Perl is highly desirable

------------

26.

About the job
Project Role : Physical Design Engineer

Project Role Description : Translate logical circuit designs into a physical layout, optimizing for area, power, and timing. Perform placement, routing, and clock tree synthesis, ensuring the design meets timing and manufacturing constraints. Work closely with timing and verification teams to resolve any physical design issues before tape-out.

Must have skills : Physical Design

Good to have skills : NA

Minimum 5 Year(s) Of Experience Is Required

Educational Qualification : 15 years full time education

Summary:

As a Physical Design Engineer, you will engage in the intricate process of transforming logical circuit designs into a tangible physical layout. Your typical day will involve optimizing designs for area, power, and timing, while performing essential tasks such as placement, routing, and clock tree synthesis. You will collaborate closely with timing and verification teams to address and resolve any physical design challenges prior to the tape-out phase, ensuring that all designs adhere to stringent timing and manufacturing constraints. This role requires a keen attention to detail and a commitment to delivering high-quality results in a fast-paced environment.

Roles & Responsibilities:

 Expected to be an SME.
 Collaborate and manage the team to perform.
 Responsible for team decisions.
 Engage with multiple teams and contribute on key decisions.
 Provide solutions to problems for their immediate team and across multiple teams.
 Mentor junior team members to enhance their skills and knowledge in physical design.
 Continuously evaluate and implement best practices in physical design methodologies.


Professional & Technical Skills:

 Must To Have Skills: Proficiency in Physical Design.
 Strong understanding of placement and routing techniques.
 Experience with clock tree synthesis and timing closure.
 Familiarity with design rule checking and layout versus schematic verification.
 Ability to utilize EDA tools for physical design tasks.


Additional Information:

 The candidate should have minimum 5 years of experience in Physical Design.
 This position is based at our Hyderabad office.
 A 15 years full time education is required.

------

27.

About the job
About Eridu

Eridu India Private Limited, a wholly owned subsidiary of Eridu Corporation, Saratoga, California, USA, is looking to hire highly motivated and talented professionals for its R&D center in Bengaluru to join our world-class team.

Eridu is a Silicon Valley-based hardware startup pioneering infrastructure solutions that accelerate AI data centers to deliver Faster AI. Today’s AI performance is frequently limited by communication bottlenecks. Eridu introduces multiple industry-first innovations across silicon, packaging, software, and systems to deliver an order of magnitude improvement in performance and unlock greater GPU utilization to speed training job completion times and tokens-per-second for more profitable inference. We do this while simultaneously reducing capital and power costs and improving reliability.

The company’s solutions and value proposition have been widely validated by leading hyperscalers.

Eridu has raised over $200M to date including its most recent, oversubscribed Series A round. The company is led by a veteran team of Silicon Valley executives who have delivered multiple billion dollar product lines and led multiple companies to billion dollar exits, including serial entrepreneur Drew Perkins, co-founder of Infinera (NASDAQ: INFN), Lightera (acq. by Ciena), Gainspeed (acq. by Nokia) and Mojo Vision (the world’s leading micro-LED company). The company is in execution mode and has a world-class engineering team with decades of experience in state-of-the art silicon, packaging, optics, software, and systems. Eridu is working with best-in-class supply chain partners including silicon, packaging and systems.

Visit our website eridu.ai to learn more.

Position Overview

We are seeking a hands-on Technical Lead, Physical Design to drive end-to-end implementation of complex SoC designs at advanced process nodes. This role combines deep technical execution with team leadership and cross-functional collaboration.

The ideal candidate is a seasoned physical design expert who has led high-complexity, production tape-outs and can independently drive floorplanning, timing closure, power optimization, and sign-off. In addition to owning critical blocks and chip-level integration, this leader will mentor engineers, establish best practices, and represent physical design in architecture and cross-functional reviews.

This is a high-impact role within Eridu’s silicon organization, supporting next-generation AI infrastructure devices built at advanced nodes (7nm, 5nm, and 3nm-class technologies).

Key Responsibilities

Lead full-chip and/or large-block physical design execution from netlist to GDSII.
Own critical aspects of implementation including floorplanning, power grid design, placement, CTS, routing, ECO implementation, timing closure, and physical sign-off.
Drive PPA (performance, power, area) optimization across complex SoC designs.
Resolve congestion, IR/EM, multi-voltage domain, and advanced-node design challenges.
Partner closely with RTL, architecture, STA, DFT, package, and foundry teams to ensure clean handoff and tape-out success.
Establish and improve physical design methodologies, flows, and automation.
Mentor and technically guide junior and mid-level physical design engineers.
Represent the physical design function in design reviews and cross-functional decision forums.
Coordinate with CAD/EDA vendors to optimize tools and flows where necessary.

------------

28.

About the job
www.EnchargeAi.com
Location : Bangalore
Title : Principal Physical Design Engineer 



Principal Physical Design Engineer (RTL-to-GDSII)
Bangalore
EnCharge AI is a leader in advanced AI hardware and software systems for edge-to-cloud computing. EnCharge’s robust and scalable next-generation in-memory computing technology provides orders-of-magnitude higher compute efficiency and density compared to today’s best-in-class solutions. The high-performance architecture is coupled with seamless software integration and will enable the immense potential of AI to be accessible in power, energy, and space constrained applications. EnCharge AI launched in 2022 and is led by veteran technologists with backgrounds in semiconductor design and AI systems.
Job Title: Principal Physical Design Engineer (RTL-to-GDSII)

Experience: 14+ Years
Technology Focus: Sub-5nm (3nm/2nm)
Location: Bangalore Hybrid


The Vision

We are seeking a Principal Physical Design Engineer who thrives on complexity and rejects the "black box" approach to EDA tools. This role is for a First Principles thinker who questions the status quo. If a standard flow isn't yielding the desired PPA (Power, Performance, Area), you dive into the PDK, the tool algorithms, and the methodology to find a better way. You are responsible for transforming raw RTL into world-class silicon by eliminating systemic bottlenecks and building a scalable, predictable path to GDSII.


Key Responsibilities

Full-Flow Ownership: Lead the implementation of massive, high-speed blocks/SoCs from Synthesis through Sign-off using the Cadence Digital Suite.
PPA Optimization: Push the theoretical limits of the PDK and tools. You will analyze and optimize the interplay between library cells, metal stacks, and tool engines to squeeze out every millivolt and picosecond.
Methodology & Scalability: Build and refine a "Push-Button" style execution methodology that is robust, repeatable, and minimizes manual "human-in-the-loop" iterations.
Cross-Functional "Left-Shift": Collaborate with RTL, Architecture, and DFT teams to influence design decisions early. You will drive a holistic approach where physical constraints inform the architecture, not just react to it.
Bottleneck Elimination: Identify "drag" in the execution pipeline—whether it’s runtime, convergence issues, or tool limitations—and architect automated solutions to bypass them.

---------------------------

29.

About the job
Company Description

Renesas is one of the top global semiconductor companies in the world. We strive to develop a safer, healthier, greener, and smarter world, and our goal is to make every endpoint intelligent by offering product solutions in the automotive, industrial, infrastructure and IoT markets. Our robust product portfolio includes world leading MCUs, SoCs, Analog and power products, plus Winning Combination solutions that curate these complementary products. We are a key supplier to the world’s leading manufacturers of electronics you rely on every day; you may not see our products, but they are all around you.

Renesas employs roughly 21,000 people in more than 30 countries worldwide. As a global team, our employees actively embody the Renesas Culture, our guiding principles based on five key elements: Transparent, Agile, Global, Innovative, and Entrepreneurial. Renesas believes in, and has a commitment to, diversity and inclusion, with initiatives and a leadership team dedicated to its resources and values. At Renesas, we want to build a sustainable future where technology helps make our lives easier. Join us and build your future by being part of what’s next in electronics and the world.

Job Description

Be part of the Renesas Memory Group, we are seeking a smart Junior Physical Design Engineer with strong expertise in RTL-to-GDSII implementation and experience working on complex STA timing closure. The role demands in-depth knowledge of industry-standard EDA tools and a solid grasp of timing closure and physical verification processes.

Key Responsibilities

Execute full RTL-to-GDSII flow: Synthesis, floorplanning, placement, clock tree synthesis (CTS), routing, and sign-off.
Perform Static Timing Analysis (STA) and ensure timing closure across all design corners.
Execute EM IR and physical verification checks (LVS, DRC).
Collaborate closely with cross-functional teams (RTL, STA, Circuit, and DFT).
Handle complex designs on 12nm and below technology nodes.


--------------

30.

About the job
Company

Qualcomm India Private Limited

Job Area

Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Hardware Engineering

General Summary

As a leading technology innovator, Qualcomm pushes the boundaries of what's possible to enable next-generation experiences and drives digital transformation to help create a smarter, connected future for all. As a Qualcomm Hardware Engineer, you will plan, design, optimize, verify, and test electronic systems, bring-up yield, circuits, mechanical systems, Digital/Analog/RF/optical systems, equipment and packaging, test systems, FPGA, and/or DSP systems that launch cutting-edge, world class products. Qualcomm Hardware Engineers collaborate with cross-functional teams to develop solutions and meet performance requirements.

Minimum Qualifications

 Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 6+ years of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.


OR

Master's degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 5+ years of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.

OR

PhD in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 4+ years of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.

Additional Job Description

Bachelor’s or Master’s degree from a top-tier institute.
13 years of experience in physical design from product-based companies.


Experience

Proven experience in managing complex subsystems and small teams.
Proficiency in complete Netlist2GDS: Floorplan, place and route (PnR), and sign-off convergence, including Static Timing Analysis (STA) and sign-off optimizations.
Hand on experience in lower technology nodes.


Job Requirements

Expertise in meeting demanding Power, Performance, and Area (PPA) requirements for complex subsystems/System on Chips (SoCs), place and route, and IP integration.
Experience in low power design implementation, including Unified Power Format (UPF), multi-voltage domains, and power gating.
Familiarity with ASIC design flows and physical design methodologies.
Strong understanding of circuit design, device physics, and deep sub-micron technology.
Experience working on multiple technology nodes in advanced processes.
Proficiency in automation to drive improvements in PPA.
Managing and driving a small team for project execution and PPA targets


Applicants: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer. If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, rest assured that Qualcomm is committed to providing an accessible process. You may e-mail disability-accomodations@qualcomm.com or call Qualcomm's toll-free number found here. Upon request, Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. (Keep in mind that this email address is used to provide reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities. We will not respond here to requests for updates on applications or resume inquiries).

Qualcomm expects its employees to abide by all applicable policies and procedures, including but not limited to security and other requirements regarding protection of Company confidential information and other confidential and/or proprietary information, to the extent those requirements are permissible under applicable law.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.



------------

31.

About the job
Job Title: Physical Design Engineer

Summary

We are seeking a talented and experienced Physical Design Engineer to join our team in Hyderabad. The ideal candidate will have 2-4 years of experience in physical design and be responsible for designing and implementing physical layouts for integrated circuits.

Roles And Responsibilities

 Work closely with the design team to understand the requirements for the integrated circuits
 Develop physical design methodologies and strategies to meet project goals
 Implement physical layouts for integrated circuits using industry standard tools
 Perform physical verification checks to ensure design meets specifications
 Collaborate with cross-functional teams to resolve design issues and optimize performance
 Stay current with industry trends and advancements in physical design technology

Qualifications

 Bachelor's or Master's degree in Electrical Engineering or related field
 2-4 years of experience in physical design for integrated circuits
 Proficiency in industry standard physical design tools such as Cadence or Synopsys
 Strong understanding of physical design methodologies and strategies
 Excellent problem-solving skills and attention to detail
 Ability to work effectively in a team environment and communicate effectively with cross-functional teams


------------------


32. 

About the job
🌟 Job Opening: Physical Design Engineer (4+ Years) – Chennai
 Location: Chennai
 Experience Required: 4+ Years
 Company: eInfochips


 Employment Type: Full-time
🚀 Job Responsibilities:
Perform block-level and full-chip physical design activities.
Handle floorplanning, placement, CTS, routing, and timing closure.
Work on physical verification including DRC, LVS, and ERC checks.
Perform STA analysis and support timing closure across corners and modes.
Handle IR drop analysis, power planning, and EM checks.
Debug and resolve physical design issues related to congestion, timing, and power.
Collaborate closely with RTL, DFT, and STA teams for design closure.
Ensure delivery of high-quality layouts meeting PPA (Power, Performance, Area) targets.
🛠 Required Skills:
Strong hands-on experience in physical design flow from netlist to GDSII.
Expertise in floorplanning, placement, CTS, routing, and signoff checks.
Experience with tools like:
Cadence Innovus
Synopsys ICC2
PrimeTime
Calibre (DRC/LVS)
Good understanding of:
Timing closure
Signal integrity
Low-power concepts
MMMC setup
Experience working on advanced technology nodes is preferred.
✅ Preferred Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Electronics / VLSI / ECE.
Strong debugging and problem-solving skills.
Good communication and teamwork abilities.


------------------

33.


About the job
Company Description

Renesas is one of the top global semiconductor companies in the world. We strive to develop a safer, healthier, greener, and smarter world, and our goal is to make every endpoint intelligent by offering product solutions in the automotive, industrial, infrastructure and IoT markets. Our robust product portfolio includes world leading MCUs, SoCs, Analog and power products, plus Winning Combination solutions that curate these complementary products. We are a key supplier to the world’s leading manufacturers of electronics you rely on every day; you may not see our products, but they are all around you.

Renesas employeess roughly 21,000 people in more than 30 countries worldwide. As a global team, our employees actively embody the Renesas Culture, our guiding principles based on five key elements: Transparent, Agile, Global, Innovative, and Entrepreneurial. Renesas believes in, and has a commitment to, diversity and inclusion, with initiatives and a leadership team dedicated to its resources and values. At Renesas, we want to build a sustainable future where technology helps make our lives easier. Join us and build your future by being part of what’s next in electronics and the world.

Job Description

Renesas has a growing presence in India with HC approaching 1000+ and significant presence with active government and university collaboration as well as OSAT footprint (JV with CG India). With the growing importance of India as a market (Growing semiconductor market and government goals / mandates of localization needs) and talent hub, our division’s (India for India) mission is to grow India market. We aspire to create products (SoCs, Software, Power and Analog chips etc) which serve needs for local market. Renesas is a leading electronics supplier globally, and this is a unique opportunity to directly influence the future products which will be offered to our customers in a new, fast growing and large Indian market with specific needs and applications.

Renesas India is seeking an experienced Staff / Senior Staff Physical Design Engineer to lead subsystem- and block-level physical implementation and closure for complex hierarchical SoCs at advanced technology nodes. This role requires deep expertise in timing, congestion, power integrity, and clocking methodologies, along with strong cross-functional collaboration skills. While this role does not own SoC-level physical design, it plays a critical role in aligning subsystem implementation with overarching SoC strategies.

Key Responsibilities

Lead block- and subsystem-level physical design closure, including timing closure, congestion mitigation, power integrity, and overall physical implementation quality
Collaborate closely with SoC-level physical design teams to align on clocking strategies, floorplanning intent, and integration requirements, without direct ownership of SoC-level execution
Apply deep understanding of clocking methodologies to ensure subsystem-level clock domains integrate cleanly into the broader SoC clock architecture
Develop, refine, and scale subsystem closure methodologies, flows, and automation, improving predictability, quality, and execution efficiency
Mentor and guide physical design engineers within subsystem teams, promoting best practices, technical rigor, and methodology adoption
Work cross-functionally with RTL design, STA, power, verification, and backend teams to ensure smooth handoffs and robust closure
Proactively identify, assess, and mitigate physical design risks, coordinating closely with SoC teams to manage impacts and drive solutions


-------------------

34.


About the job
Description

Invent the future with us. 

Ampere is a semiconductor design company for a new era, leading the future of computing with an innovative approach to CPU design focused on high-performance, energy efficient, sustainable cloud computing.

By providing a new level of predictable performance, efficiency, and sustainability Ampere is working with leading cloud suppliers and a growing partner ecosystem to deliver cloud instances, servers and embedded/edge products that can handle the compute demands of today and tomorrow.

Join us at Ampere and work alongside a passionate and growing team — we’d love to have you apply. Come invent the future with us.

About The Role

Our Physical Design Implementation Engineer will work with multi-functional global teams to implement Partition/Block level Synthesis, Floorplan, Place and Route, Timing closure, IR/EM and DRC/LVS closure for our next generation highly complex 5nm/3nm/advanced-node Server class Processor products.

PD work at Ampere is interesting, challenging, and will expand your professional breadth. We like to bring out the best in people, teach each other, and produce products that have value in the market.

In this role, you will be at the forefront of our groundbreaking AI compute solution. Our products combine high-performance general-purpose CPUs with AI capabilities, offering a compelling combination of efficiency and market reach. This revolutionary product is poised to deliver superior performance while consuming significantly less power.

What You’ll Achieve

As a member of the PD Team, you will plan and implement a significant portion of the Chip Layout partnering with design and DFT engineering peers.
You will create solutions to meet challenging frequency, power, area, clocking and design partition goals.
You’ll get to work with custom and tool-driven CTS and physical design integration methodologies.

About You

B.Tech in Electronics Engineering or Computer Engineering with 5+ years of semiconductor experience, or M.Tech with 3+ years of experience.
Good knowledge of EDA tools from Synopsys or Cadence or Mentor required. In particular experience with PTSI, Innovus, Calibre, StarRC, and Conformal LEC is essential.
Good knowledge of VLSI process and device characteristics, to make optimal trade-off between performance and power.
Good understanding of static timing analysis (STA), EM/IR and sign-off flows.
Expertise in physical design of high frequency chips with emphasis on successful timing closure.
Good understanding of physical design verification.
Experience in implementation and design closure with advanced process nodes like 5nm, 3nm etc.

Strong Hands-on Experience With

Floor planning, place & route, power and clock distribution, pin placement and timing analysis.
Timing convergence using high speed design techniques with signal integrity & EM/IR.
Good scripting skills (perl, python, tcl).
Self-driven individual and an excellent team player experienced in working with remote teams.
Must have good communication skills and the ability and desire to work as a team.

What We’ll Offer

At Ampere we believe in taking care of our employees and providing a competitive total rewards package that includes base pay, long-term incentive, and comprehensive benefits.

Benefits Highlights Include

Premium medical, dental, vision insurance, parental benefits including creche reimbursement, as well as a retirement plan, so that you can feel secure in your health, financial future and child care during work.
Generous paid time off policy so that you can embrace a healthy work-life balance 
Fully catered lunch in our office along with a variety of healthy snacks, energizing coffee or tea, and refreshing drinks to keep you fueled and focused throughout the day. 

And there is much more than compensation and benefits. At Ampere, we foster an inclusive culture that empowers our employees to do more and grow more. We are passionate about inventing industry leading cloud-native designs that contribute to a more sustainable future. We are excited to share more about our career opportunities with you through the interview process.

Ampere is an inclusive and equal opportunity employer and welcomes applicants from all backgrounds. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, citizenship, religion, age, veteran and/or military status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, physical or mental disability, or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law.


---------------


35.

About the job
Company

Qualcomm India Private Limited

Job Area

Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Hardware Engineering

General Summary

As a leading technology innovator, Qualcomm pushes the boundaries of what's possible to enable next-generation experiences and drives digital transformation to help create a smarter, connected future for all. As a Qualcomm Hardware Engineer, you will plan, design, optimize, verify, and test electronic systems, bring-up yield, circuits, mechanical systems, Digital/Analog/RF/optical systems, equipment and packaging, test systems, FPGA, and/or DSP systems that launch cutting-edge, world class products. Qualcomm Hardware Engineers collaborate with cross-functional teams to develop solutions and meet performance requirements.

Minimum Qualifications

 Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 3+ years of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.


OR

Master's degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 2+ years of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.

OR

PhD in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 1+ year of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.

Thorough knowledge of the ASIC designs Place and Route flow and methodology.
Hands-on experience in executing complete PD ownership from netlist to GDS2 including HM level PV, LEC, low-power checks and PDN, STA closure
Hands-on experience in Voltage Islands and low power methodologies, flows and implementation.
Strong background in debugging Congestion and CTS issues.
Expertise in PnR tools (Innovus/Fusion compiler) and flow.
Familiarity with Sign-off(PV/PDN/STA/FV/CLP/Scan-DRC(tk)) methodology and tools.
Understand and implement improving existing methodologies and flows.
Proficient in scripting languages (TCL,PERL,PYTHON).
Self-starter and highly motivated
To have working experience in global team environment.
To be effectively communicate the status and issues of respective owned Tasks
4-10 yrs of experience in physical design including floorplanning, PNR, CTS and signoff checks


Applicants: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer. If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, rest assured that Qualcomm is committed to providing an accessible process. You may e-mail disability-accomodations@qualcomm.com or call Qualcomm's toll-free number found here. Upon request, Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. (Keep in mind that this email address is used to provide reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities. We will not respond here to requests for updates on applications or resume inquiries).

Qualcomm expects its employees to abide by all applicable policies and procedures, including but not limited to security and other requirements regarding protection of Company confidential information and other confidential and/or proprietary information, to the extent those requirements are permissible under applicable law.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.


---------------------------------


36.

About the job
Key Responsibilities

Physical Implementation: Perform floorplanning, power planning, placement, Clock Tree Synthesis (CTS), and routing for complex, timing-critical blocks or full-chip top-level integration.
Signoff Closure: Ensure timing (STA), power integrity, and physical verification (DRC/LVS/ERC/ESD) closure on advanced technology nodes (5nm, 4nm, 3nm).
Collaboration: Coordinate with RTL design, STA, and verification teams
Requirements & Qualifications

Experience: 3–5 years on ASIC physical design.
Tools: Strong expertise in Cadence Innovus or Synopsys ICC/ICC2.
Technical Knowledge: Deep understanding of Netlist to GDSII flow
Education: B.E/B.Tech or M.E/M.Tech in Electronics/Electrical


----------


37.
About the job
(www.enchargeai.com)

Title: Staff Physical Design Engineer

Location: Greater Bengaluru Area (Hybrid)-2 days office/3 days-Home



About Company:

EnCharge AI is a leader in advanced AI hardware and software systems for edge-to-cloud computing. EnCharge’s robust and scalable next-generation in-memory computing technology provides orders-of-magnitude higher compute efficiency and density compared to today’s best-in-class solutions. The high-performance architecture is coupled with seamless software integration and will enable the immense potential of AI to be accessible in power, energy, and space constrained applications. EnCharge AI launched in 2022 and is led by veteran technologists with backgrounds in semiconductor design and AI systems.



About the Role

We are seeking a highly experienced Staff Physical Design Engineer with a strong background in chip-level implementation and EDA tools. The ideal candidate will have deep expertise in physical design, timing closure, and low-power design.



Qualifications

7-10 years of experience in physical design (excluding other areas such as logic design or CAD).
Strong understanding of EDA implementation for chip design, with hands-on experience in Cadence tools (must-have).
Strong knowledge of timing concepts and timing closure techniques for chip design.
Experience with both top-level and block-level physical design is required; experience with hierarchical floorplanning is a plus.
Proficiency in low-power design concepts and debugging is necessary.
Experience with EM/IR checks, debugging, and issue resolution, including power grid verification, is required.
Strong scripting skills in TCL or Python for automation are important.
Understanding of process concepts is needed for physical verification as part of routing tasks.
Experience with physical design methodology and flow setup is preferred; this role will involve advanced flow evaluations.
Additional experience in areas such as PDK management or foundry tapeout processes is a plus


----------------

38. 

About the job
Physical Design Engineer

Job Summary

The Physical Design Engineer will be responsible for the full-chip and/or block-level physical implementation of complex digital, mixed-signal, or RF integrated circuits from RTL to GDSII (the final manufacturing data). This role requires expertise in design methodologies to achieve optimal performance, power, and area (PPA) targets while ensuring manufacturability.
Key Responsibilities

Physical Implementation Flow: Own and execute all phases of the physical design flow, including:
Synthesis (RTL to Netlist).
Floorplanning and Partitioning (defining block boundaries, pin placement, and power grid planning).
Power Rail/Grid Design and analysis (EM/IR Drop).
Place and Route (Placement of standard cells and macro blocks, followed by signal routing).
Clock Tree Synthesis (CTS): Design and optimize the clock network for minimal skew and latency.
Timing Closure: Perform Static Timing Analysis (STA), identify critical paths, and implement design optimization techniques (e.g., buffering, sizing, ECOs) to meet all frequency and timing constraints (setup/hold).
Required Qualifications and Skills

Education

Bachelor's or Master's degree in Electrical Engineering (EE), Electronics Engineering, VLSI, or a related field.
Technical Skills & Experience



Experience: 5+ years of experience in physical design, with a proven track record of tape-outs in advanced process nodes (e.g., 16nm, 7nm, 5nm, or lower).
EDA Tools: Expert proficiency with industry-standard Electronic Design Automation (EDA) tools from vendors like Synopsys (e.g., Fusion Compiler, ICC2, Primetime), Cadence (e.g., Innovus), or Mentor Graphics.


------------------

39.


About the job
Company

Qualcomm India Private Limited

Job Area

Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Hardware Engineering

General Summary

As a leading technology innovator, Qualcomm pushes the boundaries of what's possible to enable next-generation experiences and drives digital transformation to help create a smarter, connected future for all. As a Qualcomm Hardware Engineer, you will plan, design, optimize, verify, and test electronic systems, bring-up yield, circuits, mechanical systems, Digital/Analog/RF/optical systems, equipment and packaging, test systems, FPGA, and/or DSP systems that launch cutting-edge, world class products. Qualcomm Hardware Engineers collaborate with cross-functional teams to develop solutions and meet performance requirements.

Minimum Qualifications

 Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 6+ years of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.


OR

Master's degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 5+ years of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.

OR

PhD in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering, Engineering, or related field and 4+ years of Hardware Engineering or related work experience.

Additional Job Description

Bachelor’s or Master’s degree from a top-tier institute.
13 years of experience in physical design from product-based companies.


Experience

Proven experience in managing complex subsystems and small teams.
Proficiency in complete Netlist2GDS: Floorplan, place and route (PnR), and sign-off convergence, including Static Timing Analysis (STA) and sign-off optimizations.
Hand on experience in lower technology nodes.


Job Requirements

Expertise in meeting demanding Power, Performance, and Area (PPA) requirements for complex subsystems/System on Chips (SoCs), place and route, and IP integration.
Experience in low power design implementation, including Unified Power Format (UPF), multi-voltage domains, and power gating.
Familiarity with ASIC design flows and physical design methodologies.
Strong understanding of circuit design, device physics, and deep sub-micron technology.
Experience working on multiple technology nodes in advanced processes.
Proficiency in automation to drive improvements in PPA.
Managing and driving a small team for project execution and PPA targets


----------------

40.

About the job
WHAT YOU DO AT AMD CHANGES EVERYTHING

At AMD, our mission is to build great products that accelerate next-generation computing experiences—from AI and data centers, to PCs, gaming and embedded systems. Grounded in a culture of innovation and collaboration, we believe real progress comes from bold ideas, human ingenuity and a shared passion to create something extraordinary. When you join AMD, you’ll discover the real differentiator is our culture. We push the limits of innovation to solve the world’s most important challenges—striving for execution excellence, while being direct, humble, collaborative, and inclusive of diverse perspectives. Join us as we shape the future of AI and beyond. Together, we advance your career. 

SMTS SILICON DESIGN ENGINEER

The Role

The focus of this role in the AECG ASIC organization is to lead physical design for next generation ASICs that meet Engineering, Business and Customer requirements.

Engineer with good attitude who seeks new challenges and has good analytical and communication skills. Candidate needs to have the ability and desire to learn quickly and should be a good team player.

The Person

AMD is looking for an engineering leader passionate about driving the best Power Performance Area (PPA) of ASIC solutions for AECG customers. The ideal candidate will have proven experience in driving physical design optimization to deliver industry-leading performance/area and performance/power. In this role the candidate will work with the customer, SOC architects, the CAD team and the design team and drive floorplanning and physical design flows for best in class ASIC solutions.

Key Responsiblities

Implementing RTL to GDS2 flow
Handling Floor-plan, Physical Implementation of Power-plan, Synthesis, Placement, CTS, Timing Closure, Routing, Extraction, Physical Verification (DRC & LVS), Crosstalk Analysis, EM/IR, Formal Equivalence
Deft at Handling different PNR tools - Synopsys Fusion Compiler, ICC2, Design Compiler, PrimeTime, StarRC, Mentor Graphics Calibre, Apache Redhawk, Cadence Genus, Innovus.
Tasks to include Full Chip Level Floor planning, Bus / Pin Planning, feed-thru planning, Clock Tree Synthesis, Placement, Optimization, Routing, Parasitic Extraction, Static Timing Analysis, Physical Verification and Sign Off
Identify complex technical problems, break them down, summarize multiple possible solutions,
Drive and hands-on flow development and scripting


Preferred Experience

12+years of professional experience in physical design, preferably with high-performance designs.
Experience in automated synthesis and timing-driven place and route of RTL blocks for high-speed datapath and control logic applications.
Experience in automated design flows for clock tree synthesis, clock and power gating techniques, scan stitching, design optimization for improved timing/power/area, and design cycle time reduction.
Experience in floorplanning, establishing design methodology, IP integration, checks for logic equivalence, physical/timing/electrical quality, and final signoff for large IP delivery
Strong experience with tools for logic synthesis, place and route, timing analysis, and design checks for physical and electrical quality, familiarity with tools for schematics, layout, and circuit/logic simulation
Versatility with scripts to automate design flow.
Strong communication skills, ability to multi-task across projects, and work with geographically spread out teams
Experience in FinFET & Dual Patterning nodes such as 16/14/10/7/5nm
Excellent physical design and timing background.
Good understanding of computer organization/architecture is preferred.
Strong analytical/problem solving skills and pronounced attention to details.|



------------


41.
About the job
Job Summary

We are seeking a highly experienced Principal PD Engineer for iMCU & Connectivity to lead and contribute to the physical design and implementation of complex, high-performance semiconductor integrated circuits. This role involves driving technical solutions, mentoring junior engineers, and ensuring the timely delivery of cutting-edge products within NXP's diverse portfolio.

Job Responsibilities

As a Principal PD Engineer, your responsibilities will include but are not limited to:

 Will be responsible for floor planning, power grid design, place and route, low power implementation, clock tree synthesis, timing closure, power/signal integrity analysis, to physical verification (DRC/LVS/Antenna).
The role would involve in-depth knowledge and responsibilities spanning all aspects of physical implementation.
 Drive the definition and implementation of physical design methodologies, flows, and best practices to optimize performance, power, and area.
 Perform comprehensive static timing analysis (STA) and ensure all timing constraints are met across various corners and modes.
 Conduct power integrity (IR drop) and signal integrity (Crosstalk) analysis and implement solutions to mitigate issues.
 Oversee and perform design rule checking (DRC), layout versus schematic (LVS), and other physical verification steps to ensure tape-out readiness.
 Collaborate closely with architecture, RTL design, DFT, and package teams to ensure seamless integration and successful product delivery.
 Mentor and provide technical guidance to junior and senior physical design engineers, fostering a culture of continuous learning and excellence.
 Evaluate and adopt new EDA tools and technologies to improve design efficiency and quality.

Job Qualifications

 Bachelor's degree with 12+ years of professional experience or Master's degree with 10+ years of professional experience.
Working knowledge on advance tech nodes 16ff and below is highly desirable.
Extensive knowledge and experience in back-end implementation tasks such as (timing & power), synthesis, low power implementation, power analysis, equivalence checking and STA.
Experience at top-level will be added advantage.
 Expert-level proficiency with industry-standard EDA tools for physical design (e.g., Cadence Innovus, Synopsys Fusion Compiler/ICC2, Ansys RedHawk/PowerSI).
 Deep understanding of Static Timing Analysis (STA) concepts, sign-off criteria, and tools (e.g., Synopsys PrimeTime).
 Strong knowledge of power analysis and optimization techniques (e.g., UPF/CPF, clock gating, power intent).
 Proven experience with physical verification tools (e.g., Synopsys IC Validator, Cadence Pegasus/PVS, Mentor Calibre).
 Solid understanding of semiconductor device physics, process technology effects, and DFM/DFY considerations.
 Proficiency in scripting languages (e.g., Tcl, Python, Perl) for automation of design flows and analysis.
 Excellent problem-solving, analytical, and debugging skills.
 Strong communication and interpersonal skills, with the ability to effectively collaborate with cross-functional teams and mentor other engineers.
 Ability to work independently and take ownership of critical design aspects.
xperience.

-----------

42.
About the job
Description

Invent the future with us. 

Ampere is a semiconductor design company for a new era, leading the future of computing with an innovative approach to CPU design focused on high-performance, energy efficient AI compute.

As a pioneer in the new frontier of energy efficient high-performance computing, Ampere is part of the Softbank Group of companies driving sustainable computing for AI, Cloud, and edge applications.

Join us at Ampere and work alongside a passionate and growing team - we’d love to have you apply! 

About The Role

Our Physical Design Implementation Engineer will work with multi-functional global teams to implement Partition/Block level Synthesis, Floorplan, Place and Route, Timing closure, IR/EM and DRC/LVS closure for our next generation highly complex 5nm/3nm/advanced-node Server class Processor products.

PD work at Ampere is interesting, challenging, and will expand your professional breadth. We like to bring out the best in people, teach each other, and produce products that have value in the market.

In this role, you will be at the forefront of our groundbreaking AI compute solution. Our products combine high-performance general-purpose CPUs with AI capabilities, offering a compelling combination of efficiency and market reach. This revolutionary product is poised to deliver superior performance while consuming significantly less power.

What You’ll Achieve

As a member of the PD Team, you will plan and implement a significant portion of the Chip Layout partnering with design and DFT engineering peers.
You will create solutions to meet challenging frequency, power, area, clocking and design partition goals.
You’ll get to work with custom and tool-driven CTS and physical design integration methodologies.

About You

B.Tech in Electronics Engineering or Computer Engineering with 8+ years of semiconductor experience, or M.Tech with 6+ years of experience.
Good knowledge of EDA tools from Synopsys or Cadence or Mentor required. In particular experience with PTSI, Innovus, Calibre, StarRC, and Conformal LEC is essential.
Good knowledge of VLSI process and device characteristics, to make optimal trade-off between performance and power.
Good understanding of static timing analysis (STA), EM/IR and sign-off flows.
Expertise in physical design of high frequency chips with emphasis on successful timing closure.
Good understanding of physical design verification.
Experience in implementation and design closure with advanced process nodes like 5nm, 3nm etc.

Strong Hands-on Experience With

Floor planning, place & route, power and clock distribution, pin placement and timing analysis.
Timing convergence using high speed design techniques with signal integrity & EM/IR.
Good scripting skills (perl, python, tcl).
Self-driven individual and an excellent team player experienced in working with remote teams.
Must have good communication skills and the ability and desire to work as a team.

---------------

43.

About the job
We Are:

At Synopsys, we drive the innovations that shape the way we live and connect. Our technology is central to the Era of Pervasive Intelligence, from self-driving cars to learning machines. We lead in chip design, verification, and IP integration, empowering the creation of high-performance silicon chips and software content. Join us to transform the future through continuous technological innovation.

 You Are:

You are a passionate and resourceful ASIC Physical Design engineer ready to tackle the complex challenges of next-generation silicon. With a strong foundation in VLSI concepts, you thrive in dynamic, collaborative environments and are motivated by the opportunity to learn and grow. You are adept at communicating technical ideas, whether collaborating with teammates in Bangalore or interacting with colleagues in the US. Your attention to detail and commitment to quality ensure your designs meet stringent performance and power requirements. You bring a proactive attitude, always seeking new ways to optimize and innovate, and you embrace challenges such as achieving timing closure at GHz frequencies and integrating mixed-signal macros. Your experience with DDR IP or high-speed interface implementations is a strong asset, and you are eager to contribute to world-class products at the forefront of semiconductor technology. You value teamwork, knowledge sharing, and continuous improvement, recognizing that the best solutions are built together. If you are looking to make an impact at the leading edge of physical design, Synopsys is the place for you.

 What You'll Be Doing:

 Implement and integrate state-of-the-art DDR IPs at advanced technology nodes (10nm, 7nm, 6nm, and below).
 Drive timing closure for high-frequency designs (above :4GHz), ensuring optimal performance and reliability.
 Collaborate with local and US-based teams, engaging in daily technical discussions to align on project goals and challenges.
 Integrate mixed-signal hard macro IPs and address unique integration requirements with innovative solutions.
 Design and build efficient clock trees, focusing on tight skew balancing and robust clock distribution.
 Participate in design reviews, debug issues, and contribute to continuous improvement of physical design methodologies.
 Support the implementation of best practices in floorplanning, placement, routing, and power optimization.
 Mentor junior engineers and contribute to team knowledge sharing initiatives.

 The Impact You Will Have:

Enable delivery of high-performance DDR IPs that power next-generation consumer and enterprise products.
Advance Synopsys' leadership in IP implementation at cutting-edge technology nodes.
Champion best-in-class timing closure and integration practices, raising the bar for design excellence.
Facilitate seamless cross-site collaboration, ensuring global project success.
Drive innovation in clock tree synthesis and mixed-signal integration, contributing to differentiated product offerings.
Accelerate time-to-market for customers by delivering robust, silicon-proven IP solutions.

What You'll Need:

Bachelor's or Master's degree in Electronics, Electrical Engineering, or related field.
3+ years of experience in ASIC physical design, especially at advanced technology nodes (10nm, 7nm, 6nm or below).
Proficiency with physical design tools (such as Synopsys ICC2, PrimeTime, StarRC, etc.).
Solid understanding of timing closure, clock tree synthesis, and skew balancing for high-frequency designs.
Experience with DDR interface implementation and/or mixed-signal IP integration is highly desirable.
Familiarity with scripting languages (Tcl, Perl, Python) for automation and workflow optimization.
Strong analytical and debugging skills for addressing complex design challenges.

Who You Are:

Collaborative team player who values open communication and knowledge sharing.
Detail-oriented with a commitment to quality and continuous improvement.
Self-motivated, proactive, and eager to take initiative in solving technical challenges.
Adaptable and resilient in fast-paced, evolving environments.
Effective communicator, able to articulate complex ideas to diverse audiences.

The Team You'll Be A Part Of:

You'll join the Synopsys DDR IP implementation team, a group of passionate engineers focused on delivering world-class memory interface solutions at the leading edge of semiconductor technology. The team fosters a culture of innovation, technical excellence, and collaboration, working closely with global counterparts to achieve ambitious project goals. Together, you'll help shape the future of high-performance silicon and enable the next wave of intelligent systems.

----------------

44.


About the job
Top 100 Global Semiconductor MNC in the world

Bangalore

Description





We are a innovative enterprise that designs, develops, and delivers System-on-Chip products to customers worldwide. The company is focused on AR/VR, imaging, networking, storage, and other dynamic technologies that drive today’s leading-edge applications. We combine world-class expertise, experience, and an extensive IP portfolio to provide exceptional solutions and ensure a better quality of experience for customers. Founded in 2015, We are headquartered in Japan, and have offices in Japan, Asia, United States and Europe to lead its product development and sales activities.

Physical Design Engineer – Socionext America, India

Description





We are seeking a Physical Design Engineer. This is a hands-on technical position and will have opportunities to work on a variety of challenging designs. Critical to this position is the ability to articulate technical discussions with ASIC Customers and design teams and work closely with customer, frontend and integration teams to ensure successful tape outs.




Primary Responsibilities:



Pre-layout STA to ascertain feasibility, timing constraint validation and feedback to customers and design teams
Chip/Block Level Floorplanning and pin assignment
Review top-level/block-level clock specifications for completeness and feasibility
Handle all the Physical design tasks (Placement, Timing Optimization, Clock Tree Synthesis, Routing)
Perform sign-off tasks (RC Extraction, Static Timing Analysis, IR drop analysis and Physical Verification)
Presentations and Customer Interaction in customer meetings




Necessary Qualifications:

BSEE, with 8+ years of experience or equivalent experience. MSEE preferred.
Experience in ASIC Physical Design; Experience in an SoC product development organization with tape outs from 28nm/16nm to 2nm design nodes.
Hands-on Experience with implementation EDA tools like ICC2/Innovus.
Scripting (Perl/Tcl/Python) is required.
Good understanding of ASIC frontend design.
Experience in both Flat and Hierarchical layouts.
Strong problem-solving skills and ability to analyze and resolve physical design issues related to library, timing constraints or CAD tools is required.
Experience with power analysis and IR-drop tools (primepower/Redhawk) and Static Timing Analysis (Primetime).
Experience with Physical Verification and fix PV errors in layout.
Expert handling of Verilog HDL based Netlists, Physical design libraries.
Team player with good interpersonal and communication skills; ability to explain processes and answer customer questions during meetings.



---------------

45.


About the job
Job Requirements

At Quest Global, it’s not just what we do but how and why we do it that makes us different. With over 25 years as an engineering services provider, we believe in the power of doing things differently to make the impossible possible. Our people are driven by the desire to make the world a better place—to make a positive difference that contributes to a brighter future. We bring together technologies and industries, alongside the contributions of diverse individuals who are empowered by an intentional workplace culture, to solve problems better and faster.

Key Responsibilities

Should be able to handle P&R of SoC Blocks/Top

Should be able to customize the PNR flow to meet PPA and low power requirements
Should be able to resolve timing/congestion issues
Should have worked on Multi-voltage, multi-power domain based designs
Cadence: Innovus, Calibre, Tempus
Makefile based flow
Tcl based autom

We are known for our extraordinary people who make the impossible possible every day. Questians are driven by hunger, humility, and aspiration. We believe that our company culture is the key to our ability to make a true difference in every industry we reach. Our teams regularly invest time and dedicated effort into internal culture work, ensuring that all voices are heard.

We wholeheartedly believe in the diversity of thought that comes with fostering a culture rooted in respect, where everyone belongs, is valued, and feels inspired to share their ideas. We know embracing our unique differences makes us better, and that solving the worlds hardest engineering problems requires diverse ideas, perspectives, and backgrounds. We shine the brightest when we tap into the many dimensions that thrive across over 21,000 difference-makers in our workplace.


-------------

46.

About the job
www.EnchargeAi.com
Location : Bangalore
Title : Principal Physical Design Engineer 



Principal Physical Design Engineer (RTL-to-GDSII)
Bangalore
EnCharge AI is a leader in advanced AI hardware and software systems for edge-to-cloud computing. EnCharge’s robust and scalable next-generation in-memory computing technology provides orders-of-magnitude higher compute efficiency and density compared to today’s best-in-class solutions. The high-performance architecture is coupled with seamless software integration and will enable the immense potential of AI to be accessible in power, energy, and space constrained applications. EnCharge AI launched in 2022 and is led by veteran technologists with backgrounds in semiconductor design and AI systems.
Job Title: Principal Physical Design Engineer (RTL-to-GDSII)

Experience: 14-20 Years
Technology Focus: Sub-5nm (3nm/2nm)
Location: Bangalore Hybrid


The Vision

We are seeking a Principal Physical Design Engineer who thrives on complexity and rejects the "black box" approach to EDA tools. This role is for a First Principles thinker who questions the status quo. If a standard flow isn't yielding the desired PPA (Power, Performance, Area), you dive into the PDK, the tool algorithms, and the methodology to find a better way. You are responsible for transforming raw RTL into world-class silicon by eliminating systemic bottlenecks and building a scalable, predictable path to GDSII.


Key Responsibilities

Full-Flow Ownership: Lead the implementation of massive, high-speed blocks/SoCs from Synthesis through Sign-off using the Cadence Digital Suite.
PPA Optimization: Push the theoretical limits of the PDK and tools. You will analyze and optimize the interplay between library cells, metal stacks, and tool engines to squeeze out every millivolt and picosecond.
Methodology & Scalability: Build and refine a "Push-Button" style execution methodology that is robust, repeatable, and minimizes manual "human-in-the-loop" iterations.
Cross-Functional "Left-Shift": Collaborate with RTL, Architecture, and DFT teams to influence design decisions early. You will drive a holistic approach where physical constraints inform the architecture, not just react to it.
Bottleneck Elimination: Identify "drag" in the execution pipeline—whether it’s runtime, convergence issues, or tool limitations—and architect automated solutions to bypass them.


Technical Qualifications





Experience

14-20 years in Physical Design with a proven track record of multiple sub-5nm tape-outs.
Tool Suite

Mastery of Cadence Innovus, Tempus, Joules, Pegasus, and Voltus.
Advanced Nodes

Deep understanding of sub-5nm physics: EUV constraints, multi-patterning, FinFET and IR/EM challenges.
Sign-off

Expert-level knowledge in Static Timing Analysis (STA), Physical Verification (PV), and Power Integrity (PI) and ECO methodology.
Scripting

Proficiency in Tcl and Python to develop custom flow wrappers and data-mining tools for PPA analysis.


Soft Skills & Leadership

Holistic Thinking: You look at the "Big Picture." You solve timing by fixing the floorplan or the RTL/ARCH
Influence & Rapport: You can build strong technical bridges with Front-End, Foundry, and EDA vendors to align on a unified execution strategy.
Critical Thinking: You operate on first principles. You don't just follow a vendor's "Best Practices" if they don't make sense for our specific architecture.
Mentorship: You act as a force multiplier, elevating the technical competence of the entire PD team.


---------------

47.

About the job
Meet the Team :

Join a dynamic Physical Design team that drives end-to-end SoC implementation, from RTL to tape-out. We work closely with design, verification, and architecture groups to deliver high-performance, low-power solutions. Collaboration, innovation, and technical excellence define our culture—making this an exciting place to grow, lead, and make a real impact.


About the Role:

We are seeking a highly skilled Physical Design to join our Silicon Engineering team in Hyderabad. In this role, you will drive the design, implementation, and optimization of advanced SoCs using state-of-the-art physical design methodologies. You will work on challenging synthesis, floorplanning, place-and-route, timing closure, and sign-off flows while mentoring a team of engineers and collaborating with cross-functional groups. This is an excellent opportunity to contribute to world-class silicon solutions and grow as a technical leader.


Responsibilities:

Lead and execute the end-to-end physical design flow for complex SoCs and IP blocks (RTL handoff to GDSII).
Define and drive strategies for floorplanning, CTS, placement, routing, and timing closure.
Own and optimize PPA (Power, Performance, Area) metrics for assigned designs.
Manage design constraints, synthesis strategies, and sign-off (timing, IR drop, EM, DRC/LVS).
Collaborate with RTL, DFT, verification, and packaging teams for seamless integration.
Drive EDA tool automation and methodology improvements for efficiency and scalability.
Mentor and guide junior engineers to foster technical growth and excellence.
Work with foundries and vendors on process bring-up, PDK updates, and tape-out readiness.


Requirements:

B.E./B.Tech or M.E./M.Tech in Electrical Engineering, VLSI, or related field.
6+ years of experience in ASIC physical design
Strong hands-on expertise in Synopsys (ICC2, Fusion Compiler, PrimeTime), Cadence (Innovus, Tempus), or similar tools.
Proven background in timing analysis, low-power methodologies, and ECO flows.
Deep understanding of the architecture-to-GDSII flow and sign-off requirements.
Excellent problem-solving, leadership, and communication skills.


----------------

48.

About the job
Job Description

Physical Design Engineer - Texas Instruments

About the Role: Join Texas Instruments' Connectivity engineering team as a Physical Design Engineer, where you'll play a critical role in delivering high-performance wireless connectivity solutions that power next-generation IoT, automotive, and industrial applications.

What You'll Do

Physical Implementation

Floorplanning: Create and optimize chip floorplans to meet performance, power, and area targets
Placement & Routing: Execute placement optimization and detailed routing for complex SoC designs
Clock Tree Synthesis (CTS): Design and implement robust clock distribution networks with minimal skew and jitter
Power Planning: Develop comprehensive power grid strategies including power ring, stripes, and via insertion
Flow and tool improvements: Work with EDA vendors, TI internal EDA teams to improve flow recipes, implement automations and improve design QoR

Design Verification & Analysis

Physical Verification: Execute and resolve DRC (Design Rule Check) and LVS (Layout vs. Schematic) violations
Power management: Execute and verify Lower power checks to ensure power management integrity
Low power implementation: Conduct dynamic and static power analysis to meet power budgets
Signal Integrity: Address crosstalk, IR drop, and electromigration issues

Design Optimization

Performance Optimization: Fine-tune design to meet frequency and timing requirements
Area Optimization: Minimize die size while maintaining functionality and performance
Yield Enhancement: Implement design-for-manufacturing (DFM) techniques

Collaboration & Documentation

Cross-functional Collaboration: Work closely with front-end designers, verification teams, and package engineers
Documentation: Create and maintain comprehensive design documentation and flow methodologies
Mentorship: Provide guidance to junior engineers and interns

Growth Opportunities

Work on both established connectivity platforms and breakthrough wireless technologies
Contribute to multiple tape-outs annually across different process nodes
Influence next-generation connectivity architecture decisions
Mentorship opportunities with junior engineers and cross-functional collaboration

Why This Role

Direct impact on TI's wireless connectivity portfolio performance
Exposure to diverse wireless standards and emerging technologies
Opportunity to work with state-of-the-art EDA tools and methodologies
Be part of innovation initiatives including new wireless technologies for TI

Technical Environment

Multiple process technology nodes and design rule sets
Complex mixed-signal connectivity SoC designs
Automated flow development and optimization

Qualifications

Required Qualifications

Bachelor's / Master's degree in Electrical Engineering, Electronics Engineering, Computer Engineering, or related field
2-5 years of hands-on experience in physical design implementation
>1 year of hands-on experience on SoC level physical design
Proficiency with Cadence EDA tools:
Innovus: Place and route, timing optimization
Conformal Low Power: For power mangement signoff checks
PVS: Physical verification
Tempus: Not a must have but good to have a working idea of basic timing debugs
Experience with scripting languages (TCL, Perl, Python, Shell)
Preferred Qualifications

Bachelor's / Master's degree in relevant field
Familiarity with mixed-signal and analog layout considerations
Understanding of package and system-level effects

Low Power Management Expertise

Power Gating Techniques: Implementation of fine-grain and coarse-grain power gating strategies
Multi-Voltage Domain Design: Experience with voltage islands, level shifters, and isolation cells
Clock Gating: Advanced clock gating techniques for dynamic power reduction
Retention Strategies: Design and implementation of retention flip-flops and memory retention
Power State Management: Understanding of different power modes (active, idle, sleep, deep sleep)
Always-On Domain Design: Implementation of always-on power domains and wake-up circuitry

Technical Skills

Physical Design Flow: Complete P&R flow from netlist to GDSII
Timing Closure: Multi-corner multi-mode timing analysis and optimization
Power Management: Low-power design techniques including power gating and voltage islands
Problem Solving: Debug complex timing, power, CTS and physical verification issues

Flow Improvements & Automation

Design Flow Optimization: Analyze and enhance existing physical design flows for improved efficiency and quality
Automation Development: Create and maintain automated scripts and tools to streamline repetitive tasks
Methodology Enhancement: Develop standardized design methodologies and best practices for team adoption
Quality Metrics: Implement and track key performance indicators (KPIs) for design quality and turnaround time
Flow Integration: Integrate new EDA tools and technologies into existing design flows
Runtime Optimization: Optimize tool runtimes and resource utilization for faster design closure
Cross-Platform Compatibility: Ensure design flows work seamlessly across different compute environments
Tool Evaluation: Assess new EDA tools and methodologies for potential adoption
Process Documentation: Create comprehensive flow documentation and user guides
Continuous Improvement: Identify bottlenecks and implement solutions to improve overall design productivity

Work Environment

Collaborative team environment with cross-functional projects
Access to state-of-the-art EDA tools and compute resources
Opportunity to work on cutting-edge semiconductor technologies
Multiple platform executions leading to broader learnings and professional development opportunities

--------------

49.

About the job
Job Details

Job Description:

Performs physical design implementation of custom IP and SoC designs from RTL to GDS to create a design database that is ready for manufacturing. Conducts all aspects of the physical design flow including synthesis, place and route, clock tree synthesis, floor planning, static timing analysis, power/clock distribution, reliability, and power and noise analysis. Conducts verification and signoff including formal equivalence verification, static timing analysis, reliability verification, static and dynamic power integrity, layout verification, electrical rule checking, and structural design checking. Analyzes results and makes recommendations to fix violations for current and future product architecture. Possesses expertise in various aspects of structural and physical design, including physical clock design, timing closure, coverage analysis, multiple power domain analysis, placing, routing, synthesis, and DFT using industry standard EDA tools. Optimizes design to improve product-level parameters such as power, frequency, and area. Participates in the development and improvement of physical design methodologies and flow automation.

this is for new HYD location. employee will move to the location and no relocation will be provided.

Qualifications

Job Type: 

Regular

Shift

Shift 1 (India)

Primary Location:

Regus, Madhapur

Additional Locations:

Posting Statement

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.

--------------

50.

About the job
🚀 Hiring: Physical Design Engineer | 5+ Years | VLSI
We are looking for an experienced Physical Design Engineer with 5+ years of expertise in end-to-end VLSI physical design flow.
🔧 Key Responsibilities:
Handle full-chip / block-level Physical Design implementation
Work on floorplanning, placement, CTS, routing, and optimization
Perform timing closure (setup & hold), congestion and power optimization
Analyze and fix timing, SI, IR drop, and EM issues
Collaborate with STA, DFT, and Physical Verification teams
Support tape-out and signoff activities
🛠️ Required Skills:
Strong hands-on experience with Cadence Innovus
Good knowledge of ICC2 (Synopsys) is a plus
Strong understanding of PD flow and methodologies
Experience in timing closure and STA concepts
Exposure to advanced nodes (16nm / 7nm / 5nm) preferred
Familiarity with IR/EM analysis tools
Scripting skills (TCL / Shell / Python)
🎓 Qualifications:
B.E / B.Tech / M.Tech in Electronics / Electrical / VLSI
5+ years of relevant experience in Physical Design

--------------------


51.


About the job
Job details 

Are you an experienced Staff Physical Design Engineer looking for your next challenge? 

 
Aion Silicon is actively building a pipeline of talented engineers for future opportunities, and we’d love to hear from skilled professionals who are passionate about Physical Design. 

 
With design centres across the UK, Spain, Hyderabad, and Morocco, we offer the flexibility to base this role in any of our global locations. If you’re interested in exploring future opportunities with us, please click the link below to apply and register your interest. 

 
Purpose of role 

 
The Staff Physical Design Engineer is expected to work as part of a Physical implementation design team. Within the team the designer will have responsibility for block development and possibly full chip responsibility from RTL to GDS and will be expected to be diligent their ownership of the responsibilities assigned to them. They will also be able manage a team of 2-3 engineers of lower grade and be responsible for their line management and if appropriate day-to-day tasks. 

 
Responsibilities 

 
The person should contribute to physical design projects with little guidance and can work independently.

Should be capable of solving problems of moderate complexity.

Applies judgment in interpreting results and conducting quantitative analysis.

Will be engaged in maintaining a high quality in their work.

Should be able to take multi-assignments from different customers/Teams.

Should be capable of interacting with the more experienced team members to resolve problems.

Should show ability in many tools or be an expert in one or two. Examples of which are: Synthesis, PnR, Formal verification, Custom layout techniques, Analog simulation, and Chip finishing.

Should be able to contributes to technical white papers.

May contribute to sales support as part of a team, such as Statement of Work

Should be capable of maintaining accurate time keeping.

Should be self-disciplined in executing design tasks.

Team leader of a team of 2-3 engineers or be able to train the junior engineers 

Qualifications 

 
A degree/masters or PhD in either a relevant subject 

 
Skills & experience 

 
Typically, 5+ years’ experience

Should have good tapeout experience on multiple technologies 3nm, 5nm,7nm,12nm,16nm, 22nm, 28nm

Should have worked on the DRC, LVS, ANTENNA, ERC physical verification checks

Should have good work experience and understanding of Concepts in Synthesis, Floorplaning, Placement, CTS, Routing, STA

Input skill set one or more of the following: PnR using either Synopsys ICC, Cadence EDI, Mentor Olympus, Synthesis using either Synopsys DC or Cadence RC, Experience of Formailty or Formalpro, Experience of Mentor Calibre or Synopsys IC Validator

Serves as an independent individual contributor to technical project

Demonstrates capability as a problem solver with an ability to work individually or as part of a team

Evaluates issues and defines solutions as part of a team

Broadens cross disciplinary knowledge through new assignments

-------------

52.

About the job
Description

Invent the future with us.

Ampere is a semiconductor design company for a new era, leading the future of computing with an innovative approach to CPU design focused on high-performance, energy efficient, sustainable cloud computing.

By providing a new level of predictable performance, efficiency, and sustainability Ampere is working with leading cloud suppliers and a growing partner ecosystem to deliver cloud instances, servers and embedded/edge products that can handle the compute demands of today and tomorrow.

Join us at Ampere and work alongside a passionate and growing team — we’d love to have you apply. Come invent the future with us.

About the role:

Our Physical Design Implementation Engineer will work with multi-functional global teams to implement Partition/Block level Synthesis, Floorplan, Place and Route, Timing closure, IR/EM and DRC/LVS closure for our next generation highly complex 5nm/3nm/advanced-node Server class Processor products.

PD work at Ampere is interesting, challenging, and will expand your professional breadth. We like to bring out the best in people, teach each other, and produce products that have value in the market.

In this role, you will be at the forefront of our groundbreaking AI compute solution. Our products combine high-performance general-purpose CPUs with AI capabilities, offering a compelling combination of efficiency and market reach. This revolutionary product is poised to deliver superior performance while consuming significantly less power.

What you’ll achieve:

As a member of the PD Team, you will plan and implement a significant portion of the Chip Layout partnering with design and DFT engineering peers. 
You will create solutions to meet challenging frequency, power, area, clocking and design partition goals. 
You’ll get to work with custom and tool-driven CTS and physical design integration methodologies. 

About you:

B.Tech in Electronics Engineering or Computer Engineering with 5+ years of semiconductor experience, or M.Tech with 3+ years of experience. 
Good knowledge of EDA tools from Synopsys or Cadence or Mentor required. In particular experience with PTSI, Innovus, Calibre, StarRC, and Conformal LEC is essential. 
Good knowledge of VLSI process and device characteristics, to make optimal trade-off between performance and power. 
Good understanding of static timing analysis (STA), EM/IR and sign-off flows. 
Expertise in physical design of high frequency chips with emphasis on successful timing closure. 
Good understanding of physical design verification. 
Experience in implementation and design closure with advanced process nodes like 5nm, 3nm etc. 

Strong hands-on experience with:

Floor planning, place & route, power and clock distribution, pin placement and timing analysis. 
Timing convergence using high speed design techniques with signal integrity & EM/IR. 
Good scripting skills (perl, python, tcl). 
Self-driven individual and an excellent team player experienced in working with remote teams. 
Must have good communication skills and the ability and desire to work as a team. 

What we’ll offer:

At Ampere we believe in taking care of our employees and providing a competitive total rewards package that includes base pay, long-term incentive, and comprehensive benefits.

Benefits highlights include:

Premium medical, dental, vision insurance, parental benefits includingcrechereimbursement, as well as a retirement plan,so thatyou can feel secure in your health,financial futureand child care during work. 
Generous paid time off policy so that you can embrace a healthy work-life balance
Fully catered lunch in our office along with a variety of healthy snacks, energizing coffee or tea, and refreshing drinks to keep you fueled and focused throughout the day. 

And there is much more than compensation and benefits. At Ampere, we foster an inclusive culture that empowers our employees to do more and grow more. We are passionate about inventing industry leading cloud-native designs that contribute to a more sustainable future. We are excited to share more about our career opportunities with you through the interview process.

Ampere is an inclusive and equal opportunity employer and welcomes applicants from all backgrounds. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, citizenship, religion, age, veteran and/or military status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, physical or mental disability, or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law.


-----------

53.

About the job
About The Role

Ceremorphic AI hardware combines knowledge across many domains, including AI, compilers, computer architecture, analog circuits, and memories.

The candidate would own and drive the physical implementation of next-generation SOCs and assume the below responsibilities.

Understand the requirements and define physical implementation methodologies.
Collaborate with architecture, design, front end, and CAD teams to deliver high-quality physical designs.
Implement and verify designs at all levels of hierarchy in the SOC.
Interact with foundry over matters of technology, schedule, and signoff
Supervise resource allocation and scheduling.

Key Requirements

Hands-on expertise in all of the following areas: Floorplanning, Power planning, Logic and clock tree synthesis, Placement, Timing Closure, Routing, Extraction, Physical Verification (DRC & LVS), Crosstalk Analysis, EM/IR
Full chip/ top-level expertise in multiple chip tape-outs.
Good understanding of SCAN, BIST, and ATPG.
Strong background in TCL/Perl programming is a must.
Expertise in double patterning process nodes is desirable.
Expertise in Cadence RTL-to-GDSII flow is preferred.

------------

54.

About the job
Description

Invent the future with us.

Ampere is a semiconductor design company for a new era, leading the future of computing with an innovative approach to CPU design focused on high-performance, energy efficient AI compute.

As a pioneer in the new frontier of energy efficient high-performance computing, Ampere is part of the Softbank Group of companies driving sustainable computing for AI, Cloud, and edge applications.

Join us at Ampere and work alongside a passionate and growing team - we’d love to have you apply! 

About the role:

Our Physical Design Implementation Engineer will work with multi-functional global teams to implement Partition/Block level Synthesis, Floorplan, Place and Route, Timing closure, IR/EM and DRC/LVS closure for our next generation highly complex 5nm/3nm/advanced-node Server class Processor products.

PD work at Ampere is interesting, challenging, and will expand your professional breadth. We like to bring out the best in people, teach each other, and produce products that have value in the market.

In this role, you will be at the forefront of our groundbreaking AI compute solution. Our products combine high-performance general-purpose CPUs with AI capabilities, offering a compelling combination of efficiency and market reach. This revolutionary product is poised to deliver superior performance while consuming significantly less power.

What you’ll achieve:

As a member of the PD Team, you will plan and implement a significant portion of the Chip Layout partnering with design and DFT engineering peers. 
You will create solutions to meet challenging frequency, power, area, clocking and design partition goals. 
You’ll get to work with custom and tool-driven CTS and physical design integration methodologies. 

About you:

B.Tech in Electronics Engineering or Computer Engineering with 8+ years of semiconductor experience, or M.Tech with 6+ years of experience. 
Good knowledge of EDA tools from Synopsys or Cadence or Mentor required. In particular experience with PTSI, Innovus, Calibre, StarRC, and Conformal LEC is essential. 
Good knowledge of VLSI process and device characteristics, to make optimal trade-off between performance and power. 
Good understanding of static timing analysis (STA), EM/IR and sign-off flows. 
Expertise in physical design of high frequency chips with emphasis on successful timing closure. 
Good understanding of physical design verification. 
Experience in implementation and design closure with advanced process nodes like 5nm, 3nm etc. 

Strong hands-on experience with:

Floor planning, place & route, power and clock distribution, pin placement and timing analysis. 
Timing convergence using high speed design techniques with signal integrity & EM/IR. 
Good scripting skills (perl, python, tcl). 
Self-driven individual and an excellent team player experienced in working with remote teams. 
Must have good communication skills and the ability and desire to work as a team. 

What we’ll offer:

At Ampere we believe in taking care of our employees and providing a competitive total rewards package that includes base pay, long-term incentive, and comprehensive benefits.

Benefits highlights include:

Premium medical, dental, vision insurance, parental benefits includingcrechereimbursement, as well as a retirement plan,so thatyou can feel secure in your health,financial futureand child care during work. 
Generous paid time off policy so that you can embrace a healthy work-life balance
Fully catered lunch in our office along with a variety of healthy snacks, energizing coffee or tea, and refreshing drinks to keep you fueled and focused throughout the day. 

And there is much more than compensation and benefits. At Ampere, we foster an inclusive culture that empowers our employees to do more and grow more. We are excited to share more about our career opportunities with you through the interview process.

Ampere is an inclusive and equal opportunity employer and welcomes applicants from all backgrounds. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, citizenship, religion, age, veteran and/or military status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, physical or mental disability, or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law.


------------

55.

We are looking for a results-oriented physical design engineer to join our design team. You will be developing project plans and stages, designing microchip and processor layout circuits and evaluating semiconductor devices and components.

To ensure success as a physical design engineer, you should demonstrate extensive knowledge of circuit engineering and experience in a similar role. A first-class physical design engineer will be someone whose expertise translates into optimized circuit output and device functionality.

Physical Design Engineer Responsibilities:
Planning integrated circuit and processor design projects and stages.
Collaborating on circuit engineering projects with the design team.
Designing layouts for processors and controller architectures.
Reviewing product requirements and logic diagrams.
Developing prototypes, testing circuit designs, and optimizing output.
Enabling easy routing, as well as reducing delays and resolving glitches.
Developing codes, as well as maintaining layout automation features and macros in layout entry tools.
Evaluating semiconductor devices and components, as well as performing modifications.
Documenting physical design processes, such as circuit layouts and device specifications.
Keeping informed of developments and innovation in physical design engineering.
Physical Design Engineer Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in computer engineering, electrical engineering, electronics, or related.
A minimum of two years' experience in physical design engineering.
Advanced proficiency in HDL languages, such as Verilog.
In-depth knowledge of design flow process control systems.
Experience with analog electronics and MOS transistors.
Great collaboration, and communication skills.
Superb analytical and problem-solving abilities.
Excellent organizational, time management, and recordkeeping skills.


-------------

56.

We are seeking a highly motivated Physical Design Engineer to join our cutting-edge semiconductor company. The ideal candidate will have a passion for designing and implementing advanced digital, mixed-signal, and RF integrated circuits. If you are a detail-oriented and results-driven engineer with a track record of delivering successful projects, we encourage you to apply.
Physical Design Engineer Responsibilities & Duties
Lead the physical design flow for advanced digital, mixed-signal, and RF integrated circuits
Define, develop, and maintain design methodologies, scripts, and flows for physical design and verification
Develop physical implementation and integration plans for complex integrated circuits
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including design, verification, and hardware teams, to ensure the successful implementation of designs
Drive design closure and timing convergence with advanced physical implementation techniques
Provide technical support and guidance to other members of the design team
Stay up-to-date with the latest technology trends and advancements in physical design
Physical Design Engineer Qualifications & Skills
Master's degree in Electrical Engineering or a related field
Experience with industry-standard physical design tools (Cadence, Synopsys, Mentor Graphics)
Knowledge of advanced process nodes (7nm, 5nm, etc.)
Experience with scripting languages such as Python, TCL, or Perl
Strong understanding of VLSI design principles
Experience in low-power design techniques
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Electrical Engineering or related field
Minimum of 5 years of experience in physical design of digital, mixed-signal, or RF integrated circuits
Expert knowledge of industry-standard EDA tools for physical design and verification, such as Synopsys ICC, Primetime, and StarRC
Proven experience with advanced physical implementation techniques, such as multi-patterning, layout-dependent effects, and low-power design
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong interpersonal and communication skills with the ability to collaborate effectively with cross-functional teams
Self-motivated and able to work independently in a fast-paced and dynamic environment


------------------


57.

Physical Design Engineer
Qualification Required:

Typically requires minimum of 4-10 years of experience in Physical Design with mainstream P&R tools
Bachelors OR Master’s Degree Engineering in Electronics or Electrical or Telecom or VLSI Engineering.
Roles And Responsibilities

Working on 10nm/7nm/5nm or lower nodes designs with various customers for deployment.
Expertise in solving customer's problems for critical designs to achieve desired performance, area, and power targets.
Responsible to develop flow and methodology for doing placement, CTS, and routing.
Provide training and technical support to customers
Required Technical And Professional Expertise:

Solid experience in place & route flow (placement guidelines, clock-tree synthesis, routing, timing optimizations). Experience on hierarchical designs and/or Low Power implementation is an advantage.
Experience on Synthesis, interfacing with RTL and implementation designers to achieve better quality of results.
Experience on Floorplan design, including placement of hard macros, padring, power grid and custom analog routes.
Experience on Static Timing Analysis related activities (constraints development, parasitic extractions, sign-off requirements).
Knowledge of Physical Verification (DRC/LVS/DFM, chip finishing).
Hands-on experience with FinFET technologies is an advantage
Compensation and Benefits

A candidate’s pay within the range will depend on their work location, skills, experience, education, and other factors permitted by law. This role may also be eligible for performance-based bonuses subject to company policies. In addition, this role is eligible for the following benefits subject to company policies: medical, dental, vision, pharmacy, life, accidental death & dismemberment, and disability insurance; employee assistance program; 401(k) retirement plan; 10 days of paid time off per year (some positions are eligible for need-based leave with no designated number of leave days per year); and 10 paid holidays per year.


---------

58.

The Physical Design Engineer is a key contributor to the semiconductor design process, focusing on the physical implementation, optimization, and verification of integrated circuits (ICs). The role involves collaborating with cross-functional teams to deliver high-quality, high-performance IC designs on time.

Responsibilities
Implement and optimize the physical design of integrated circuits.
Collaborate with RTL design and verification teams to meet design specifications.
Perform place and route, floorplanning, and timing analysis.
Conduct design rule checking (DRC) and layout versus schematic (LVS) verification.
Optimize power, performance, and area (PPA) metrics of chip designs.
Develop and maintain scripts to automate design processes.
Generate and review physical design reports and documentation.
Qualifications
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, or a related field.
Experience with physical design tools such as Synopsys, Cadence, or Mentor Graphics.
Strong understanding of digital circuit design and semiconductor processes.
Experience with place and route, timing analysis, and DRC/LVS verification.
Excellent problem-solving and analytical skills.
Good communication and teamwork abilities.
Skills
Synopsys Physical Design Suite
Cadence Virtuoso
Mentor Graphics Calibre
Power, Performance, and Area (PPA) Optimization
Script Automation (e.g., TCL, Perl, Python)
Timing Analysis
Design Rule Checking (DRC)
Layout Versus Schematic (LVS)


------------

59.


Job Description :

We are looking for a highly skilled & experienced PD expert to join our Flows & Methodologies team. The candidate must be experienced, hands-on and have robust understanding of physical design including Floorplan, Power-plan, Place & Route, UPF, CTS. This role requires strong analytical skills, attention to detail, and the ability to work collaboratively with cross-functional teams. Proficiency in relevant EDA tools and a solid understanding of digital design principles are essential for success in these positions

Scope of Responsibilities:

As part of the Design Enablement team of the organization, you need to work closely with SoC cross functional teams to develop and define Physical Design methodology to meet SoC & IP level objectives on low geometry nodes (3/5/16nm)
Your scope of work will cover tools and flows definition, requirement management for SoC Place & Route, UPF, Formal Verification, Floorplan & Power-Plan
You will work with EDA Vendors to proactively review latest tools and flows offerings in Physical Implementation domains. Evaluate latest offerings and benchmark with organization used tools, flows, and methodologies.
Work with EDA Vendors to review and resolve blocking issues
You will be an actor of change for deploying new tools & methodologies across the organization

Qualifications

Specific skills & knowledge :

Bachelor or Master or Ph.D. in Electronics Engineering and specialization in VLSI domain
10+ years of hands-on experience in Physical Design : UPF, Formal & Physical verification, floorplan, power-plan, Place & Route
Proven experience in delivering physical implementation closure methodology ensuring timing & physical convergence
Experience in Synopys & Cadence tool sets (Fusion Compiler, Innovus) , low geometry node issues, working with EDA team in reviewing & resolving blocking issues in project
Experience in customizing flows & methodology to meet low power & area objectives of SoC
Strong scripting skills for Automation and Flow development using PERL/TCL/Python. 
Can – do attitude, openness to new environment, people and culture   
Strong communication skills (written and verbal), problem solving, attention to detail, commitment to task, and quality focus
Ability to work independently and as part of a team

-------------


60. 

Job description

We are looking for Senior Physical Design Engineers with strong handson experience in RTLtoGDSII implementation. The engineer should be capable of independently owning two or more design partitions of varying complexity.

The selected PEO will have endtoend ownership of the Physical Design flow, starting from synthesis through PNR, Clock Tree Synthesis (CTS), timing closure, and physical signoff.

Key Expectations

Own and deliver RTL2GDSII for multiple partitions
Handle complete PD flow including:
Synthesis
Floorplanning, Placement, CTS
Routing and optimization
Timing closure across all corners
Perform and close signoff checks, including:
VCLP
IR / RV
FEV
LVS / DRC
Work independently with minimal supervision
Drive issue resolution for timing, congestion, power, and physical verification
Communicate effectively with internal teams and stakeholders
Skill Requirements

Strong handson experience in:
PNR
Timing closure
Physical signoff
Proven ability to own blocks independently
Good communication and coordination skills
Experience

5+ years of relevant experience in ASIC Physical DesignRole & responsibilities



